Table      of Contents 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Record Number of Auto Industry Firms 
Receive Employment Subsidies; Honda To Begin Auto Exports From 
Canada 

   Aviation Industry - FEATURE:  Airlines Restructuring To Break 
Even 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  MOF, MHA Fight Over Introduction of 
Local Consumption Tax; JAIDO Program To Ship Excess Equipment to 
Developing Countries 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Regional, Trust Banks Facing 
Difficulties; Initial Performance of New Securities Subsidiaries 
Unremarkable 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  FEATURE:  Trade Promotion 
Association Activities in China; Plastic Manufacturers Increasing 
Presence in Shenzhen 

   VIETNAM:  Nichimen Purchases 15 Percent Stake in Vietnam Motors; 
Mitsubishi Motors Requests Permission To Assemble Commercial Vans; 
Suzuki, Indonesia's Salim Group Begin Assembling Motorbikes; Freight 
Company Forms Joint Venture With Two State-Owned Firms; Firm 
Shifting Some Manufacturing Operations to Ho Chi Minh City;  JTB To 
Initiate Tours for Japanese Industry Groups 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - Citizen Watch To Market New CNC Lathe 
Series in Asia 

   Petroleum/Energy - Mitsubishi Oil Begins Offshore Exploratory 
Drilling in Vietnam 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics   Japanese Government To 
Procure Nine Supercomputers in FY94 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE:  Social, Economic Impact 
of Rural Labor Migration 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Foreign-Funded Holding Companies 
Seen As Rising Trend; Almost 12,000 Foreign-Funded Enterprises 
Approved in First Quarter; Power Sector Official on Foreign Funding 
Needs, Limitations; Australia's National Mutual Insurance Sets Up 
Office in Beijing; German, Dutch Companies To Build Oil-Gas Storage 
Facility in Zhuhai; Taiwan Group Invests $150 Million in 
Semiconductors, Other Areas; Record Number of Contracts Signed at 
Guangzhou Export Fair; Haikou City Seeks Foreign Capital To Build 
New International Airport; Malaysian Group Interested in Nanjing 
Infrastructure Projects; Foreign-Invested Firms Key Players in 
Shenyang Development Zone; Foreign Investors Now Free To Form Real 
Estate Companies in Shanghai; Hong Kong Company Claims Mainland 
Investments of HK$30 Billion; Sun Hung Kai Adopts 'Prudent Strategy' 
on Mainland Investment; Hong Kong, UK Investors Set Up Guangzhou 
Electronics Plant; Beijing Municipality Brings in $2 Billion in 
Foreign Investments; Beijing Makes $225 Million in Export Deals at 
Guangzhou Trade Fair; Dalian's Achievements in Economic Opening; 
Qingdao Reports Volume of Foreign Capital Over Last 10 Years; 
Shandong Chemical Company Forms Joint Venture With German Firm 

   Taiwan:  Economics Minister Proposes Method To Protect Investment 
in Mainland; Growth in Exports to PRC Via Hong Kong Slow; Ban on 
Imports of Japanese Wine, Cigarettes May Be Lifted for GATT; Tariffs 
on 758 Products Being Reduced or Eliminated 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Supreme Court, Patent Office Propose New 
Patent Trial System; FEATURE:  76 Core Companies Exempted From 
Credit Restrictions; FEATURE:  ROK Public Database Project Moves 
Forward; FEATURE:  ROK High-Speed Information Highway Project 
Described; KAIST Establishes Optical-Electronics Research Center; 
ROK Restructuring State-Funded S&amp;T Research Institutes; ROK 
Scientific and Technological Research 'Stagnating'; Government Views 
Post-"G7" Advanced S&amp;T Projects; ROK Government Biotech Research 
Funding for 1994; MOST to Oversee Patent Applications for Affiliated 
Institutes; High-Level 'Semiconductor Equipment Council' Formed; 
ROK-PRC 'Technomart' Held in Beijing; ROK Third Country Exports 
'Frustrated' by Quotas; Seoul District Civil Court Sets Up 
International Trade Court; ROK Becoming World's Top Cathode-Ray Tube 
Producer; Korea Heavy Industries To Build Thermal Power Plant in 
India; Anam To Supply Semiconductors to Japan's NEC; Hyundai Steel 
Pipe To Build Plant in Vietnam; Mando Machinery To Manufacture 
Caliper Brakes in China; Samsung To Export TDX to Russia; Kia 
Motors, UK's Rover To Develop Car Engines 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  FEATURE: Impact of Industrial Growth 
on Rice Production; Pulp Joint Venture With Japan Announced; 
Daihatsu, Other Foreign Auto Production Growth; State Bank Obtains 
$87-Million Loan; Contract For Digital Telephone System Signed; 
Pertamina Begins Gas Production in South Sumatra; Hong Kong Bank 
Opens Branch in Semarang; Firms To Participate in New Power 
Projects; Government Allocates $1 Billion for Oil Refinery Projects 

   MALAYSIA:  Petronas To Supply Petroleum Products to Zimbabwe; 
South Korea Emerges as Seventh Foreign Investor 

   PHILIPPINES:  Singapore Firm To Build Port, Industrial Complex in 
Iloilo; Board of Investments Approves PVC Resin Venture 

   SINGAPORE:  American, Japanese Firms Open Disk Drive Facility; 
Government Plans To Lower Corporate Tax Rate 

   THAILAND:  Cabinet Authorizes Additional Telephone Circuits; PTT, 
Total Company To Establish Gas Venture in Vietnam; Joint Venture 
With PRC Firm in Asian Oil Projects 

   VIETNAM:  Japanese Ministry To Help Establish Postal Savings 
System; Resolution Highlights City's Growth, Development Objectives; 
Malaysian Company Upgrades Rice Mill for Exports; French Company to 
Produce Beer, Soft Drinks; State Bank to Invest $73 Million for 
Automation; Rice Export Earnings Lower, Processing Methods Poor; 
French, Norwegians in Harbor Construction Project; British Petroleum 
in Lubricant Plant Joint Venture; Rubber Industry Seeks Foreign 
Partners 
   (Pacific Rim Economic Review FBPSP 94-10) 

   JAPAN:  Auto Industry - Record Number of Auto Industry Firms 
Receive Employment Subsidies -- Due to Japan's prolonged economic 
slump, the auto industry still remains in "serious condition" 
because of excess labor problems.  According to statistics compiled 
by the Ministry of Labor (MOL), a record number of petitions for 
"employment adjustment subsidies" used to pay for "one-time layoffs" 
were filed by car manufacturers and auto parts makers in FY93. 
Furthermore, after a two-month decline, the number of petitions 
filed in March 1994 was higher than in February, which is an 
"indication" that both the economy and auto demand will probably not 
recover until the second half of FY94. (For previous reporting on 
the auto industry's employment subsidies, see the 9 March 1994 
Pacific Rim Economic Review, pages 1-4). 

   In April 1993, the Japan Automobile Manufacturers Association 
(JAMA) and the Japan Auto Parts Industries Association (JAPIA) 
separately petitioned the MOL for "industry designation" so that 
member firms would be eligible for employment adjustment subsidies. 
The first car maker to apply for subsidies did so in October 1993, 
after which five applied in November, 21 in December, 15 in January, 
13 in February, and 16 in March for an total of 71 separate 
petitions.  An aggregate of 126,028 employees were affected 
involving 241,862 work-days.  Based on a monthly average, 1,750 
employees from each of 12 firms were "laid-off" for 3.3 days in each 
of five months. 

   The auto parts industry, which is composed of many small and 
medium sized firms, has been even more seriously affected by the 
economic downturn.  Auto parts makers began petitioning for 
subsidies as early as May 1993.  From that time to March 1994, a 
total of 1,990 petitions were filed, from an average of 180 firms a 
month, and subsidies were paid covering 225,787 people and 441,532 
work-days, which is nearly double that of finished car makers. 
Based on a monthly average, 114 employees from each of 180 firms 
were furloughed for two days in each of 11 months.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 9 May 94 p 9) 

   Honda To Begin Auto Exports From Canada -- Honda Motor Co. will 
begin exporting "Civic" sub-compact cars manufactured in Ontario, 
Canada by the end of May.  The company plans to export over a 1,000 
slightly modified three-door hatchback and the two-door coupe Civics 
to Taiwan and Brazil by yearend and plans to "further increase" the 
number of autos and their destinations in 1995.  Honda already sells 
Canadian cars in the United States, but this will be the first time 
that Canadian-made cars will be exported to other countries.  Honda 
is looking to establish its North American plants as "export bases," 
so long as currencies remain stable in both Canada and the United 
States. 

   Honda began manufacturing cars in Canada in 1988 and now produces 
100,000 Civics annually, of which 80 percent are exported to the 
United States.  The company decided to begin exporting from Canada 
because appreciation of the yen has made Canadian-made Civics more 
price competitive, and the three-door hatchback model is not 
produced in the United States.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 5 May 94 
p 6) 

   Aviation Industry - FEATURE:  Airlines Restructuring To Break 
Even -- SUMMARY:  Japan's three major airlines--Japan Air Lines 
(JAL), All Nippon Airways (ANA), and Japan Air System (JAS)--have 
projected "all-around deficits" for FY93 after final accounting is 
completed, and all three have frozen new hiring for 1994, according 
to press reports.  JAL is undertaking large-scale voluntary 
retirement efforts, and ANA and JAS are trying to come up with new 
staffing levels and wage structures. 

   JAL Attempting To Downsize To Regain Profitability -- In January 
1993, JAL predicted it would begin turning profits in FY94 after 
having implemented emergency measures in FY93, according to the 18 
April NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN.  However, JAL has suffered a decline in 
international business operations, which account for 70 percent of 
its revenues, and a drop in revenues from first class and business 
class fares because of Japan's prolonged recession.  In mid-January, 
JAL announced a medium-term restructuring plan to reduce its main 
office staff of 22,000 to 17,000 by the end of 1997.  It also 
announced plans to reduce FY94 costs by 100 billion yen ($980 
million), cut back considerably on capital investment, and shrink 
basic wage raises and bonuses. 

   On 19 April, in a further step to downsize, JAL disclosed an 
initiative to lower the qualifying age for voluntary retirement to 
30 years of age, according to the 20 April YOMIURI SHIMBUN. 
Consequently, 72 percent, or 15,000 of JAL's employees have become 
eligible for voluntary retirement.  JAL hopes to retire 550 
employees this year under this initiative and plans to solicit 
candidates to retire during two window periods, from May to June and 
from September to October 1994.  JAL will offer 1.9 times the 
"standard retirement pay" to those applying to retire in the May- 
June window and 1.7 times the amount in the September-October 
window.  In general terms, YOMIURI noted, employees could receive 
between 10 and 16.2 million yen ($98,000-158,000) in retirement pay 
if they apply during the May-June window and between 8 and 13.5 
million yen ($78,000-132,000) during the September-October window 
period. 

   YOMIURI noted that JAL registered a FY92 current loss of 53.8 
billion yen ($528 million) and expects a deficit in FY93--for the 
third consecutive year--of 30 billion yen ($294 million) after final 
accounting is completed.  The 20 April NIKKEI SANGYO also observed 
that because of the yen's rapid appreciation, JAL "will be no 
competition" against foreign airlines unless it reduces personnel 
costs to 15 yen per available-payload-ton-kilometer (ATK).  In FY93, 
JAL's personnel costs were 20 yen per ATK.  One yen in personnel 
costs per ATK is equivalent to 10 billion yen ($98 million), which 
means that JAL will have to reduce its personnel expenses by 50 
billion yen ($490 million) in order to remain globally competitive. 

   In other restructuring projects, JAL is considering variations in 
job contracts such as rotating groups of employees or distributing 
work among employees by consignment (19 April NIKKEI SANGYO).  It 
has formed a nine-member project team to design a new merit-based 
wage system by the end of May (20 April NIKKEI SANGYO) and a JAL 
subsidiary which offers vocational classes for flight attendants is 
grooming its students for jobs with foreign airlines (25 April 
ASAHI). 

   JAL has also decided to purchase seven 150-passenger Boeing B737- 
400 airplanes by 1997 for 30 billion yen ($294 million) in an effort 
to boost its share of the domestic air travel market to 40 percent, 
according to the 29 April NIKKEI.  JAL currently uses B747s, DC10s, 
and B767s on its domestic routes, but has decided the smaller B737- 
400's are better suited for the considerably lower volume of 
travelers on domestic routes between regional airports.  The B737- 
400 also requires less fuel and is less noisy than current planes. 

   ANA Experiencing 'Worst Crisis' in Its History -- The 5 May ASAHI 
SHIMBUN reported that ANA, Japan's second largest airline, expects 
to turn a profit of 3 billion yen ($29 million) in FY93.  However, 
ASAHI explained ANA is actually operating at a loss because the 
revenues that pushed it into the black came from selling its planes 
to a leasing company.  Now, however, ANA must lease back its planes. 
According to the 18 April NIKKEI SANGYO, ANA is in the midst of "the 
worst crisis since it was established." 

   The 20 April NIKKEI SANGYO reported that ANA recently eliminated 
two departments and 11 sections at its main office as part of 
restructuring measures decided in February.  ANA President Seiji 
Fukatsu is seeking reforms to "create a structure that endures even 
if the slow growth trend in the industry continues."  Specifically, 
according to ANA's personnel director, "personnel expenses will have 
to be restrained" because competition is expected to become more 
severe. 

   NIKKEI SANGYO reported that, in early May, a project team of six 
to seven ANA pilots will begin working on a new personnel wage 
system to replace the "65-hour guarantee system" ANA currently uses 
to pay its pilots and flight attendants.  This system, a "company 
relic" from 30 years ago, guarantees pilots and attendants a minimum 
of 65 flight hours each month.  ANA management has determined that 
the average actual time spent in flight is 55 hours for pilots and 
60 hours for attendants and believes it is "irrational" to guarantee 
hours not spent in actual flight.  ANA plans to present a new wage 
structure to its labor unions for negotiation by this fall. 

   JAS Trying To Balance Personnel Expenses, Staffing Requirements 
-- According to the 22 April NIKKEI, Japan's third largest airline, 
JAS, announced that its FY93 current loss of 12.6 billion yen 
($123.5 million) was 4.4 billion ($43 million) less than its FY93 
mid-year forecast because of an unexpected 2.2 percent rise in the 
number of passengers during the second half of FY93.  JAS is 
striving to break even in FY94 by shrinking its staff down to 5,500 
and by reexamining operations on "inefficient routes." 

   The company's personnel director believes, according to the 19 
April NIKKEI SANGYO, that a new employment system must be created 
quickly to deal with the fewer number of employees resulting from 
the company's freeze on hiring and other streamlining efforts.  The 
paper noted about 8 percent of the 1,300 JAS attendants retire each 
year.  The company will cover this year's staffing requirements by 
increasing the number of flights per attendant per day, and by 
utilizing the 30 attendants who will be available after JAS suspends 
its Narita-Honolulu flight in late May.  There is an "urgency" 
within JAS to review its current employment structure in order to 
balance staffing requirements and control personnel expenses, NIKKEI 
SANGYO noted. 

   Economic Trends - FEATURE:  MOF, MHA Fight Over Introduction of 
Local Consumption Tax -- SUMMARY:  The Ministry of Home Affairs 
(MHA) and the Ministry of Finance (MOF) are expected to clash over 
the MHA's proposal to introduce local consumption taxes, according 
to press reports.  While the MHA asserts that local consumption 
taxes are necessary to enhance local autonomy, the MOF argues that 
the current system of sharing nationally collected tax revenues with 
local governments is sufficient for their needs. 

   The 20 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) reported that on 19 
April the MHA presented a plan to the Local Tax Subcommittee of the 
Tax Commission, an advisory council to the prime minister, on the 
introduction of local consumption taxes.  According to the MHA plan, 
local consumption taxes would be collected by manufacturers, 
wholesalers, and retailers,and paid to the relevant prefectures.  If 
a manufacturer or seller has branches in several prefectures, its 
headquarters could pay the company's entire bill to the prefecture 
where it is located or each branch could pay its portion--which 
would be calculated based on the number of employees--to each 
prefecture.  The MHA has not disclosed any specific tax rate as yet, 
but is expected to seek one half of the anticipated "increase" of 
the current national consumption tax. 

   The 17 April NIKKEI predicted that the MOF and the MHA will 
engage in a "fierce battle" over the introduction of local 
consumption taxes.  The Tax Commission, which deliberates on various 
proposed changes in the tax system, plans to submit its own 
recommendation to the prime minister by the end of June as part of 
Japan's macroeconomic package to expand domestic demand.  While the 
MHA hopes to strengthen the tax revenue bases of local governments, 
the MOF wants to retain leadership in the taxation field.  The 
article explained that some Tax Commission members would represent 
the MOF and others the MHA in fighting an "MOF-MHA battle" at 
commission meetings.  The article added that Tax Commission Chairman 
Hiroshi Kato is "skeptical" of local consumption taxes. 

   MHA's Arguments for Local Consumption Taxes -- According to the 4 
May NIKKEI, the MHA presented the following reasons for the 
introduction of local consumption taxes: 

--Increased local autonomy was one of the policies emphasized by the 
Hosokawa administration, and, now by the Hata administration.  To 
realize increased local autonomy, MHA argued, local governments must 
broaden their sources of tax revenue. 

--Local governments spend 64 percent of Japan's total public 
expenditures, but collect only 35 percent of total tax revenues. 
Local governments should increase their tax revenues to match 
expenditures. 

--Local governments need to balance the ratio of local direct and 
indirect taxes to be consistent with the goal of the current tax 
reform, which is to correct imbalances in the current ratio of 
direct and indirect taxes.  The ratio of local direct taxes to local 
indirect taxes is currently nine to one, while the ratio on the 
national level is seven to three.  Moreover, the MHA argued, direct 
taxes tend to be largely affected by ups and downs in business 
conditions, while social welfare expenditures of local governments 
tend to be fixed. 

--Local governments need to broaden their tax revenue bases. 
Seventy percent of Japan's welfare expenditures are shouldered by 
local governments, and these expenditures are expected to increase 
as the number of elderly increases as a percentage of the total 
population.  Local governments' public works investments are also 
1.7 times higher than those of the central government. 

   The 4 May NIKKEI explained that the MHA supports local 
governments which hope to broaden their own tax revenue bases in 
order to prepare for increasing social welfare costs and public 
works investment.  Under the current consumption tax system, which 
gives 39.2 percent of consumption tax revenues collected by the 
National Tax Administration Agency to local governments, the local 
government share would not increase unless the central government 
increases the tax rate.  According to the NIKKEI article, local 
governments hope to have "independent" consumption taxes, which they 
could raise to meet their future needs. 

   MOF's Arguments Against MHA's Proposal -- According to the 4 May 
NIKKEI, the MOF argued as follows: 

--The MHA's proposal would "complicate" the consumption tax system. 

--The proposal would create more paperwork for companies and 
wholesale and retail stores, who would have to pay the taxes, since 
they would have to pay two government entities. 
--The current system whereby central and local governments share 
consumption tax revenues--39.2 percent of total consumption tax 
revenues is transferred to local governments--is sufficient to meet 
local government needs. 

--The proposal would be contrary to the principle that the place 
where a tax is assessed should also receive the benefit of the tax 
revenue.  Manufacturers, wholesalers, and retailers of a product, 
who must pay consumption taxes at each stage, are not necessarily 
located in the same prefecture where final consumption occurs. 

   MHA's Dilemma on Uniform Local Tax Rate -- The 8 May NIKKEI 
reported that there would be no easy way for the MHA to make the 
proposed local consumption taxes consistent with its assertion of a 
desire to increase local autonomy.  The NIKKEI article quoted an 
influential member of the Tax Commission, who is "neutral between 
the MOF and the MHA," as saying that local consumption taxes as 
proposed by the MHA could not qualify as independent local taxes, 
because each prefecture would not be allowed to set its own tax rate 
according to its needs.  On the other hand, NIKKEI added, imposition 
of a same tax rate in all prefectures would be the only way to 
prevent corporations from moving their operations from one 
prefecture to another in pursuing the lowest tax rate. 

   Consumption Tax Increase -- According to the 4 May NIKKEI, the 
MHA plans to propose that 2 percent of the anticipated "increase" in 
the consumption tax be collected by local governments.  The MHA 
assumes that the Tax Commission would recommend a raise from the 
current 3 percent to 7 percent, and the MHA hopes to gain control of 
half, or 2 percent, of the increase in the form of a local 
consumption tax. 

   The 4 May NIKKEI reported that the MOF was particularly concerned 
about the MHA's assumption of a consumption tax increase.  The MOF's 
position is that since the consumption tax increase is a very 
sensitive issue, the MHA should not talk about it as if it were 
already granted.  The MOF is concerned, the article continued, that 
there is sufficient opposition to an increase, and arguments over 
how much of the "increase" should go to local governments would 
further complicate the MOF's advocacy of a consumption tax rate 
increase.  The MOF is also worried that opposition to local 
consumption taxes may lead to a smaller increase in the consumption 
tax rate. 

   Uncertainty on Outcome of Tax Commission Debates -- According to 
the 10 May SANKEI SHIMBUN, current political uncertainties make the 
outcome of Tax Commission debates uncertain.  The Tax Reform Council 
of the coalition parties has not reconvened since the inauguration 
of the Hata Cabinet due to the Social Democratic Party of Japan's 
(SDPJ's) departure from the coalition.  Even though the Tax 
Commission and the Tax Reform Council could agree on the consumption 
tax increase, they may decide not to go so far as to specify the 
rate of increase, since the SDPJ, now an opposition party, is 
expected to oppose an increase in consumption tax rates. 
Consequently, SANKEI concluded, the introduction of a local 
consumption tax "may not necessarily be decided" by the end of June, 
but the battle will continue. 

   JAIDO Program To Ship Excess Equipment to Developing Countries -- 
The Japan International Development Organization (JAIDO) and Toho 
Rayon, a medium-sized producer of acrylic fibers, rayon, and cotton, 
have agreed to ship Toho's surplus cotton spinning equipment to 
Uzbekistan and to establish a joint venture company there in 1994, 
according to the 2 May NIKKEI BUSINESS.  This is the first project 
in a new program JAIDO initiated in March 1993 to facilitate the 
shipment of surplus Japanese industrial production equipment to 
areas like the former Soviet Union, Southeast Asia, and South and 
Central America and to initiate joint manufacturing projects.  The 
cotton spinning equipment to be sent to Uzbekistan will come 
primarily from Toho mills in Tokushima and Gifu Prefectures, where 
roughly 10 percent of the company's annual production capacity was 
idled in FY93. 

   An Uzbek delegation visiting Japan agreed to the transfer of the 
facilities after inspecting Toho's mills in March.  The details of 
the joint venture company, such as the precise value of the deal, 
how much Japan will contribute, and who will have managing rights to 
the facilities, have not been finalized.  However, the project is 
expected to be in the range of between 1 and 2 billion yen ($9.5-19 
million).  JAIDO will solicit capital participation from Japanese 
trading companies and European and U.S. investment funds and 
companies.  Uzbekistan will obtain the funds to buy the equipment 
through cooperative financing from private banks and international 
financial institutions. 

   JAIDO was established in 1989 by the Overseas Economic 
Cooperation Fund, an organ of the Japanese Government, and 112 
member firms of the Japan Federation of Economic Organizations 
(Keidanren), to promote investment and economic cooperation by 
Japanese private enterprise in developing countries, according to 
the 1993 KAIGAI KEIZAI KYORYOKU BENKAN (Guide to Overseas Economic 
Cooperation).  To date, JAIDO has contributed 3 billion yen ($28.6 
million) for 40 joint venture projects in developing countries, 
according to NIKKEI BUSINESS.  In addition to the textile industry, 
JAIDO is seeking cooperation projects involving other Japanese 
industrial sectors, such as steel, electronics, and automobiles. 

   Financial Issues - FEATURE:  Regional, Trust Banks Facing 
Difficulties -- SUMMARY:  Recent press reporting on developments in 
the Japanese banking industry indicates that problems in the 
regional and trust bank sectors are leading to consolidation. 

   Regional Banks Merging -- The 20 April ASAHI SHIMBUN reported 
that three second-tier regional banks will merge in January 1995. 
Kita-Nippon Bank, Tokuyo City Bank, and Shokusan Bank will merge to 
become the "Heisei Bank." The new bank will be the fifth-largest 
second-tier regional bank in Japan.  The merger was reported by the 
21 April Asahi to have been a bailout "orchestrated" by the MOF for 
Tokuyo which posted losses in FY91 and FY92.  There are 
approximately 130 regional banks in Japan, but this will be the 
first merger of regional banks to create a base of operations beyond 
their prefectural boundaries.  The merger may usher in a new type of 
''super-regional bank," the 21 April NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN (NIKKEI) 
reported.  Finance Minister Hirohisa Fujii welcomed the merger, 
saying that it was in line with the MOF's monetary policy, according 
to a 20 April NHK NEWS report carried on the Nikkei Telecom 
Database. 

   The 6 April NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN (NIKKEI KINYU) reported that 
several other regional banks are also experiencing difficulties and 
have had to cut dividends to preserve their internal financial 
resources and to give priority to writing off bad loans.  Ashikaga 
Bank, the leading regional bank, cut its dividends effective with 
the September 1993 midyear earnings report.  Hyogo Bank, the largest 
second-tier regional bank, and Taiheiyo, Hanwa, and Osaka Banks 
either stopped paying dividends altogether or cut them as of FY92. 

   The 21 April ASAHI article observed that regional banks are 
facing competition from the more powerful commercial banks, which 
have been aggressively establishing branches in the areas 
traditionally served by  the regional banks.  An article in the 10 
May EKONOMISUTO observed that commercial banks are now allowed to 
engage in a broader range of banking operations and have a greater 
capacity for raising funds than regional banks.  It anticipated 
intensified competition for regional banks as financial 
liberalization unfolds--particularly the liberalization of interest 
rates on demand deposits, which will occur in October.  Commercial 
banks have an advantage over regional banks because the size and 
scope of operations allows them to absorb the increased cost of 
paying higher interest on demand deposits, according to the 4 
November 1993 NIKKEI. 

   Trust Banks To Merge With Commercial Banks -- Japan's seven trust 
banks are in particularly serious condition, according to another 
article in the 10 May EKONOMISUTO.  The article observed that 
through mergers and bailouts by Japan's more powerful commercial 
banks, the current seven trust banks could shrink to as few as four. 
Toyo Trust and Banking, Chuo Trust and Banking, and Nippon Trust 
Bank will have to be merged with their main commercial banks to 
survive at all.  This will leave only four of the "original" trust 
banks including Mitsubishi Trust, Sumitomo Trust, Yasuda Trust, and 
Mitsui Trust.  The competition posed by the establishment of trust 
subsidiaries by the major commercial banks under the Financial 
System Reform Law enacted in FY93 makes the future of the trust 
banks "dim," the article reported.  The Bank of Tokyo and Industrial 
Bank of Japan have already set up trust subsidiaries, and the 
remaining commercial banks plan to establish them by 1995.  The 
existing trust banks would be forced to merge as a result of this 
increasing competition, according to the article. 

   The EKONOMISUTO article observed that Nippon Trust Bank, the 
smallest of Japan's seven trust banks in terms of assets, is 
''particularly shaky."  It has the highest percentage of 
nonperforming assets to total loans of all seven trust banks, 
according to the 13 April ASAHI SHIMBUN.  Already, Mitsubishi Bank, 
the fifth largest commercial bank, has decided to provide 
comprehensive assistance" to Nippon Trust, which could entail a 
merger, according to the 21 April NIKKEI.  This is possible under 
the Financial System Reform Law that enables an existing trust bank 
to become a subsidiary of a commercial bank.   If Mitsubishi were to 
make Nippon Trust a subsidiary, rather than establish an entirely 
new subsidiary like the other banks, it would control a subsidiary 
able to engage in the full range of trust banking business, 
including the lucrative pension fund business.  If this happens, the 
NIKKEI article observed, it would influence the strategies of other 
major commercial banks as they plan their own trust subsidiary 
businesses.  (For previous reporting on the Nippon Trust merger see 
the 4 May 94 Pacific Rim Economic Review, pages 3-4). 

   Initial Performance of New Securities Subsidiaries Unremarkable 
-- The five securities subsidiaries that were newly established by 
banks in 1993 as a result of the Financial System Reform Law have 
announced their FY93 profits, according to the 11 May NIKKEI KINYU 
SHIMBUN (NIKKEI KINYU).  The law allows the "mutual entry" by banks, 
trust banks, and securities companies into one another's sectors 
through subsidiaries, according to the 20 January NIKKEI KINYU.  To 
date, five banks have established securities subsidiaries.  In July 
1993, the Industrial Bank of Japan established IBJ Securities, Long- 
Term Credit Bank of Japan established LTCB Securities, and the 
government-affiliated Central Bank for Agriculture and Forestry 
established Norinchukin Securities.  Two trust banks, Mitsubishi 
Trust and Sumitomo Trust, followed in November 1993, with Mitsubishi 
TB Securities and STB Securities, respectively. 

   IBJ Securities, LTCB Securities, and Norinchukin Securities, all 
posted ordinary profits of 500 million yen ($4.76 million), 200 
million yen ($1.9 million), and 200 million yen ($1.9 million) 
respectively as of the fiscal year ending March 1994, while 
Mitsubishi TB Securities and STB Securities recorded ordinary losses 
of roughly 500 million yen ($4.76 million), according to the 11 May 
NIKKEI KINYU.  The article attributed the discrepancy to the fact 
that the two trust bank subsidiaries were "unprofitable" in the bond 
trading area, which, the article observed, would be the main source 
of profits for the subsidiaries in the future. 

   The poorer performance on the part of the trust bank subsidiaries 
was due to their inability to cover stock market losses incurred 
early in 1994 with profits from operations during 1993, the NIKKEI 
KINYU reported.  The Ministry of Finance requires that the 
subsidiaries show a "current surplus," which does not include net 
bond sales, for three years after beginning operations.  The only 
subsidiary to do so was the government-affiliated Norinchukin 
Securities, with a current surplus amounting to 100 million yen 
($952 thousand).  Norinchukin's profits were bolstered by 
commissions it received on the sale of investment trust funds of a 
co-affiliate in the Norinchukin group, Norinchukin Investment Trust 
Management Co. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - CHINA:  FEATURE:  Trade Promotion 
Association Activities in China -- SUMMARY:  Recent press articles 
have reported on the activities of the Association for the Promotion 
of International Trade of Japan (APITJ), a group of 750 companies 
formed to promote trade relations with China. APITJ's chairman is 
Yoshio Sakurauchi, former speaker of the Diet House of 
Representatives. 

   Trade Mission to Three Gorges Hydroelectric Project -- According 
to the 16 April ASAHI SHIMBUN, the APITJ will organize a trade 
mission to China in mid-July to seek opportunities for Japanese 
companies to participate in construction of China's 1.16 trillion 
yen ($11.6 billion) Three Gorges hydroelectric project.  The 
mission, comprising representatives from about 20 financial, heavy 
electric, and construction machinery companies, is scheduled to meet 
with the Three Gorges Project Construction Committee, the Ministry 
of Water Resources, and the China Three Gorges Project Development 
Corporation, and to visit the construction site.  The 13 April 
NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN noted that the mission will be in China from 
11 to 17 July. 

   ASAHI observed that the Japanese companies are interested because 
international bidding for the purchase of construction equipment and 
generators, "which will use foreign capital," has already begun. 
The contract for the design and manufacture of 12 of the 26 700,000- 
kw generators has already been let to a group that includes Harbin 
Electrical Machinery, Dongfang Electric, and their foreign 
subcontractors. 

   APITJ Establishes Financial Investment Cooperation Division -- 
According to the 18 April NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN, the APITJ, which has 
about 750 member companies--including the major city banks, long- 
term credit banks, trust banks, and major life insurance companies- 
-has recently established a Financial Investment Cooperation 
Division to assist banks, life insurance, and securities companies 
with investment in China.  The new division will have a staff of 
four and will provide broad support ranging from negotiations to 
feasibility studies, contracts, and procuring capital, to Japanese 
power generation, transportation, and communications companies 
investing in China. 

   APITJ To Provide Credit Investigation Services -- According to 
the 23 March NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN, the APITJ will initiate a 
service to provide market surveys and credit investigations of 
Chinese companies for Japanese firms.  The credit investigations 
will be consigned to the Huaxia Company, a credit investigation 
company established in 1993 by the APITJ and the China International 
Trust and Investment Corporation (CITIC).  Huaxia is jointly funded 
by the People's Bank of China, the State Administration of Taxation, 
and the State Administration for Industry and Commerce, and has as 
its objective the "promotion of the development of a market economy 
by disclosing company information," according to the NIKKEI SANGYO. 

   The credit reports will include the company's name and address, 
names and areas of responsibility of its executives, whether the 
company has export authorization, the condition of its plants and 
production facilities, its major banks, the status of the company's 
collateral, and its financial situation.  They will also assess the 
abilities of the companies' managers and future prospects, according 
to NIKKEI SANGYO.  The 25 March ASAHI noted that the credit 
investigations will cost 20,000-100,000 yen ($200-$1,000) for 
association members and 30,000-150,000 yen ($300-$1,500) for 
nonmembers. 

   According to NIKKEI SANGYO, the proliferation of small, private 
Chinese companies and the "deeply rooted tendency" on the part of 
both state-owned companies and small private enterprises to refuse 
disclosure of company information, which they regard as "state 
secrets," is a "major headache" for smaller Japanese companies 
considering investing in China.  To help resolve this problem, the 
APITJ has also "obtained the cooperation" of the Ministry of Foreign 
Economic Relations and Trade, the State Planning Commission, the 
Ministry of Machine-Building, and the Ministry of Agriculture, 
"which controls the rapidly expanding township enterprises under its 
agriculture department." 

   Reports on Direct Investment in China -- According to the 15 
April ASAHI, a report released by the APITJ showed that in 1993 
there were 3,488 cases of Japanese direct investment in China, an 
increase of 1.93 times over 1992.  This amount nearly equals the 
total of 3,694 direct investment deals made between 1976, when China 
instituted its policy of opening to the outside world and 1992. 

   In 1993 the value of contracts was $2.96 billion, an increase of 
36.2 percent over 1992.  As a result, the cumulative value of 
contracts from 1976 through 1993 was $8.86 billion.  Japan's share 
of worldwide investment in China in both number and contract volume 
is about 4 percent, ASAHI reported. 

   Plastic Manufacturers Increasing Presence in Shenzhen -- Furukawa 
Kasei, a manufacturer of molded plastic products, has begun a 5 
million yen ($50,000) expansion of its wholly owned Shenzhen plant 
because of increasing demand from its two primary customers in 
China, Canon and Matsushita Electric Industry.  The Shenzhen plant 
was completed at the end of 1993, at which time it had 20 injection 
molding machines and employed 75 workers.  The expansion, to be 
completed by the end of 1994, will add 25 350-ton injection molding 
machines and increase the workforce to 150. 

   Furukawa will also build a new metal-mold plant to manufacture 
gears, small metal parts, and cases for computers and printers.  The 
plant is scheduled to begin operations in mid-1994.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 6 Apr 94 p 26) 

   MG, a plastics manufacturer based in Miyazaki Prefecture, in 
conjunction with Technoplas, a local plastics maker, has set up a 
joint venture company in Shenzhen to manufacture and assemble 
consumer electronics and office products.  The new company, 
Technopower, is capitalized at HK$3 million ($390,000), with MG 
contributing 30 percent and Technoplas 70 percent.  Its new 6,500- 
square-meter, four-story plant was scheduled to be completed by mid- 
April.  The injection molding machines will be imported from Japan. 
Initially the plant will employ about 300 workers.  MG expects sales 
of about 100 million yen ($1 million) in FY94.  In conjunction with 
this move, MG will reduce production at its Iwasa City plant, which 
will be used to develop and design new products and for OEM 
(original equipment manufacturing) production of new products such 
as water coolers and mobile telephones.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 
12 Apr 94 p 15) 

   Riccheru, a major manufacturer of plastic household products 
based in Toyama City, Toyama Prefecture, will establish a joint 
venture company in Shenzhen in 1994.  The partner, an unidentified 
Hong Kong plastic-products manufacturer, will build a plant by the 
middle of the year on a 1,600-square-meter site in the Shenzhen 
Special Economic Zone.  The plant, scheduled to begin operations 
next year, will produce about 200-300 million yen ($2-3 million) 
worth of products in the first fiscal year.  Initially the products 
manufactured in Shenzhen will be sold in Japan, which will reduce 
Riccheru's export ratio by about 50 percent.  Riccheru plans to have 
three plants in China within five years.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI 
SHIMBUN 9 Apr 94 p 8) 

   VIETNAM:  Nichimen Purchases 15 Percent Stake in Vietnam Motors 
-- Nichimen, Japan's eighth largest general trading company, has 
purchased a 15 percent stake in Vietnam Motors, the joint-venture 
auto assembly company based in Hanoi, for $1.5 million.  When the 
investment is finalized in May, Nichimen will dispatch personnel to 
Vietnam Motors to assist company management. 

   Vietnam Motors requested the investment from Nichimen, since it 
wanted to increase its capital base from $7.65 million to $10 
million in order to strengthen its management and undertake various 
projects, such as setting up after-sales service centers in Hanoi. 
Nichimen will assist Vietnam Motors in securing funds to import 
essential assembly machinery and equipment and in procuring auto 
parts. 

   Vietnam Motors was established in 1991 under the Vietnam 
Government's policy of encouraging joint-venture auto assembly 
operations.  Columbian Motors of the Philippines joined the Hoa Binh 
Company, a firm "under the umbrella" of the Ministry of 
Transportation and Communications, in the joint venture.  Actual 
auto assembly operations began in 1992, and in 1993, 800 passenger 
cars and commercial vehicles were produced using parts supplied by 
Mazda and South Korea's Kia Motors.  Vietnam Motors plans to 
assemble 3,000 units in 1995.  (Tokyo NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 27 Apr 94 
p 11) 

   Mitsubishi Motors Requests Permission To Assemble Commercial Vans 
-- Mitsubishi Motors has applied to the Vietnamese Government for 
permission to begin assembling its "Delica" commercial vans in 
Vietnam in a four-way joint venture with Mitsubishi Corp., 
Malaysia's Proton Motors, and Viettrans Shimex, Vietnam's state- 
owned shipping company.  While waiting for government approval, 
Mitsubishi Motors is thoroughly assessing the local auto parts 
industry and replacement parts market and aims to have a "smooth" 
start to its production operations by contributing to the 
development of Vietnam's auto parts industry. 

   Mitsubishi has sent inspection teams to visit some twenty local 
parts companies, including car seat manufacturers and machine tool 
firms, to assess quality, costs, production levels, and parts supply 
systems.  One problem is that since Vietnam's auto manufacturers 
have production systems focused on the country's military vehicle 
production, only a few parts manufacturers have worked with auto 
companies.  However, Mitsubishi feels it will be possible to procure 
some parts by using firms that specialize in auto repair and 
maintenance. 

   Mitsubishi feels it essential to raise its local parts content 
ratio early on and to develop a replacement parts supply system 
after actual production begins.  Thus, it intends to help the parts 
manufacturers upgrade their operations.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 
25 Mar 94 p 12) 

   Suzuki, Indonesia's Salim Group Begin Assembling Motorbikes -- 
Suzuki, Japan's largest manufacturer of minicars and the world's 
third ranking producer of motorcycles, the Salim Group, Indonesia's 
largest conglomerate, and "a company affiliated with the Vietnamese 
Army" will form a joint venture company to assemble Suzuki two- 
wheeled vehicles in Vietnam.  While Suzuki and the Salim Group have 
reached agreement on the project and have already begun assembling 
Suzuki motorbikes, negotiations are still in progress with the 
Vietnamese company over investment ratios and other matters.  When 
agreement is reached, a basic production and sales structure will be 
developed.  Suzuki is the first Japanese motorcycle company to begin 
actual production in Vietnam, beating out Honda, which is in the 
planning stage for a production plant in Vietnam. 

   Early this year the Salim Group began assembling Suzuki 
motorbikes in Ho Chi Minh City through one of its affiliated 
companies in Hong Kong.  The assembly plant was built by an 
Indonesian subsidiary of Salim.  Prior to this, Suzuki and the Salim 
Group's automobile division, the Indomobil Group, had formed an 
Indonesian joint venture company, "Indomobil-Suzuki Indonesia," that 
also will supply the assembly equipment and parts for the Vietnam 
assembly operation and will dispatch technicians to train the 
Vietnamese employees. 

   The joint venture company plans to assemble 7,500 units in 1994. 
With the installation of a painting line this summer, total 
production capacity will be more than 60,000 units annually.  In 
1995 the company projects sales of 20,000-30,000 units.  (Tokyo 
NIHON KEIZAI SHIMBUN 2 May 94 p 3) 

   Freight Company Forms Joint Venture With Two State-Owned Firms -- 
Nihon Rojitemu (Japan Logistic Systems), a Tokyo-based freight and 
warehousing company not listed on Japan's stock exchanges, has 
entered into a joint venture agreement with two Vietnamese state- 
owned companies to establish a passenger service and freight 
delivery company in Hanoi, according to the 28 April NIKKEI RYUTSU 
SHIMBUN.  The 16 April NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN noted that this is the 
first joint venture between Japanese and Vietnamese companies in the 
transport sector.  The agreement has been signed and actual 
operations have begun, according to NIKKEI RYUTSU. 

   The new company, "Rojitemu-Vietnam Corp.," will be capitalized at 
320 million yen ($3.66 million), with Nihon Rojitemu's subsidiary, 
Rojitemu International, contributing 60 percent and the Vietnamese 
firms 20 percent each.  Part of Rojitemu's investment entails 
purchasing and shipping small buses and commercial trucks to Vietnam 
for use by the joint venture.  A total of 74 vehicles will be 
supplied over 5 years.  The NIKKAN KOGYO article reported that Nihon 
Rojitemu will begin by shipping two trucks, 18 small buses, and four 
passenger cars. 

   NIKKAN KOGYO noted that the Vietnamese joint venture partners are 
the No. 14 Passenger Transport Company and the No. 2 Freight 
Transport Company, both of which are "directly under" Vietnam's 
Ministry of Transportation and Communications.  The chairman of 
Rojitemu-Vietnam's Higher Management Council is Hironori Nakanishi, 
a managing director of Nihon Rojitemu, and the company's president 
is the deputy chief of Nihon Rojitemu's International Development 
Department. 

   The new company will use the buses in the Hanoi area, 
particularly for chartered service for foreign tourists, NIKKAN 
KOGYO stated.  The trucks will be used to deliver freight in Hanoi 
and in northern Vietnam.  The company also will operate an auto 
repair and parts supply service.  It anticipates earnings of 
$500,000 the first year of operation, a figure it anticipates will 
grow to $1.75 million annually as its freight operations expand. 

   The joint venture is Nihon Rojitemu's fifth operation in Asia, 
following the establishment of subsidiaries in Taiwan, Singapore, 
Hong Kong, and Thailand, NIKKEI RYUTSU noted.  With the entry of 
more Japanese companies into Vietnam, the company plans to expand 
its scope of operations to include building "exclusive use" 
warehouses and processing goods for shipment. 

   Firm Shifting Some Manufacturing Operations to Ho Chi Minh City 
-- Organ Needle Co., a Nagano-based manufacturer of precision 
machinery and Japan's leading producer of all types of sewing 
machine needles, is shifting some of its production operations to 
Vietnam because the appreciation of the yen and higher production 
costs are making its products uncompetitive internationally.  In 
mid-May Organ Needle and its subsidiary, Organ Kyushu, will 
incorporate a company, "Organ Needle Vietnam," in Ho Chi Minh City. 
The total investment amount, the investment ratio between the two 
companies, and who will be the new company's president have not yet 
been decided.  The new company has signed an agreement with a Ho Chi 
Minh City export promotion zone to build a production plant, will 
begin production there in April 1995, and by 1996 will have shifted 
all production of home sewing machine needles to its Vietnam plant. 

   Organ signed a lease agreement to build a plant on a 1.3 acre 
site in the Tan Thuan Export Processing Zone on the outskirts of Ho 
Chi Minh City.  (For information on the Tan Thuan zone, see the 23 
February 1994 Pacific Rim Economic Review, pages 40-41). 
Construction of the plant, which will cost 400 million yen ($3.9 
million), will begin in July.  Some 160 Vietnamese workers will be 
employed, and when the plant achieves full production it will 
produce 100 million sewing machine needles annually for export, 
mainly to China and Southeast Asia. 

   At present all home sewing machine needles are produced at the 
Organ Kyushu plant, which has 170 workers.  But when this production 
is shifted to Vietnam, the Kyushu plant will convert to producing 
some of the industrial sewing machine needles currently manufactured 
at Organ's five plants in Nagano Prefecture, which have 880 
employees.  The company's president states that 150 of the Nagano 
employees will retire within 3 years, so that further employment 
reductions will not be necessary. 

   In the future, Organ is considering the establishment of 
"multiple" overseas production bases, given the yen's appreciation 
and the company's worsening export profit situation.  (Tokyo NIKKEI 
SANGYO SHIMBUN 2 May 94 p 8) 

   JTB To Initiate Tours for Japanese Industry Groups -- Japan 
Travel Bureau (JTB), the country's largest tour company, will begin 
offering Vietnam "inspection tours" to Japanese companies that are 
investigating the possibility of setting up operations in Vietnam. 
The tours will be conducted monthly, beginning in late May, and will 
be organized by industry, such as textiles, food products, household 
electrical goods, electronic parts, and so forth.  The first tour 
will be for executives of major companies in Japan's uniform 
manufacturing industry. 

   The tours will feature visits to the Ho Chi Minh City offices of 
the Vietnam Chamber of Commerce and Industry and the State 
Commission for Cooperation and Investment for briefings on Vietnam's 
economic conditions and its legal and tax systems.  Groups will also 
visit factories with the potential for meeting the contracted 
production needs of Japanese firms, in addition to visits to port 
facilities and container yards and "first-hand observations" of 
Vietnam's distribution infrastructure. 

   After the tours, companies wanting to link up with Vietnamese 
firms will work through Hori and Co., a Tokyo-based consulting firm, 
which will help finalize actual arrangements.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO 
SHIMBUN 19 Apr 94 p 19) 

   Machine Tools/Robotics - Citizen Watch To Market New CNC Lathe 
Series in Asia -- Citizen Watch, which manufactures precision 
machine tools in addition to time pieces, will introduce a new, 
lower-cost series of computer numerically controlled (CNC) lathes 
for the Asian market in June.  Its Cincom Basic Series consists of 
three models which have 55 percent fewer parts, are equipped with 
Fanuc numerical controllers, and have thermal-expansion compensation 
mechanisms to allow for precision processing over extended periods. 
The lowest price model will cost 5 million yen ($50,000), the mid- 
range model 7-13 million yen ($70,000-130,000), and the top of the 
line machine, which will be able to process prototypes and multiple 
workpieces, will cost 18-22 million yen ($180,000-220,000).  To make 
the lathes more user-friendly in the China market, Citizen will 
develop machine readouts and displays that use Chinese characters. 

   To market this series in the Asia, Citizen will expand its 
Singapore service base and establish a second base either in Hong 
Kong or China's coastal area.  Citizen hopes to increase its 
overseas machine tool sales by about 13 billion yen ($130 million), 
or about 30 percent, in three years.  (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 
20 Apr 94 p 15) 

   Petroleum/Energy   Mitsubishi Oil Begins Offshore Exploratory 
Drilling in Vietnam -- Mitsubishi Oil Company, which has rights to 
explore for petroleum in Vietnam's offshore areas, began exploratory 
drilling in the third week of April.  The drilling is being 
conducted in the 15-2 oilfield, a 3,370 square kilometer block 
located about 80 kilometers southwest of Ho Chi Minh City, using the 
No. 5 White Dragon Maru, owned by the Japan Ocean Drilling Company. 
A minimum of three wells will be drilled by next year.  The first 
will be sunk to a depth of 3,000-4,000 meters, and Mitsubishi Oil 
should be able to determine "by early summer" whether it was 
successful. 

   To support its drilling operations, Mitsubishi Oil will establish 
bases in Ho Chi Minh City and Vung Tau and dispatch 13 employees 
from Tokyo.  This is said to be the first time a Japanese primary 
petroleum distribution company has acted as an oil field operator. 
(Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 26 Apr 94 p 13) 

   Semiconductors/Computers/Electronics - Japanese Government To 
Procure Nine Supercomputers in FY94 -- The Japanese Government 
revealed on 25 April that it will procure nine supercomputers for 
eight government-related organs with funds from the FY94 regular 
budget.  Three bids involve "new purchases," while the other six 
will be upgrades to existing machines.  Following budget 
deliberations in the Diet, bidding should begin in July.  During the 
FY93 procurement period, the government increased the number of 
supercomputers it planned to buy from four to 15 due to demands for 
more social infrastructure spending and concern over "Japan-U.S. 
(trade) friction."  Consequently, the number of supercomputers 
procured during FY94 "will likely increase as well." 
   A breakdown of the organizations involved is as follows: 

Ministry of Education 

National Laboratory for High Energy Physics          Hitachi Upgrade 
Hokkaido University Computer Center                  Hitachi Upgrade 
Tokyo Institute of Technology Computer Center   Control Data Upgrade 
Kyoto University Computer Center                     Fujitsu Upgrade 
Tohoku University Institute of Fluid Sciences           Cray Upgrade 
University of Tokyo Institute for Solid State Physics        New Bid 

Science and Technology Agency 

Japan Atomic Energy Research Institute (JAERI)       Fujitsu Upgrade 
      "                      "                               New Bid 

Special Public Corporation 

Electric Power Development Corp.                             New Bid 

   At least two of the nine units will be massively parallel- 
processing supercomputers (MPP).  JAERI plans to purchase a new MPP 
supercomputer as well as upgrade its vector-processing unit, and the 
High Energy Physics Laboratory is looking to switch from a vector 
supercomputer to an MPP machine.  (Tokyo NIKKAN KOGYO SHIMBUN 26 Apr 
94 p 1) 

   CHINA:  Domestic Developments - FEATURE:  Social, Economic Impact 
of Rural Labor Migration -- SUMMARY:  An increasing number of 
surplus rural laborers are migrating to large cities to look for job 
opportunities every year.  While township enterprises have until 
recently absorbed most of the floating population, the pressure on 
China's more prosperous cities is growing and expected to become 
worse by the end of the century.  Recent articles in the PRC and 
Hong Kong press have discussed the social and economic impact of 
this trend. 

   According to an article in the 4 April issue of the PRC-owned 
weekly CHING CHI TAO PAO (ECONOMIC REPORTER), published in Hong 
Kong, there are currently 120 million surplus rural laborers in 
China, and the number is expected to reach 140 million by the year 
2000.  Township enterprises, which provided 75 million jobs from 
1978 to 1992, are now "saturated" with rural laborers.  According to 
an article in the 16 February issue of the Hong Kong monthly KUANG 
CHIAO CHING (WIDE ANGLE), the migration started in the mid-l980s 
when the authorities relaxed controls on population mobility, 
allowing peasants to work in urban areas.  The number of peasants 
traveling to cities to find jobs has risen steadily since then. 

   The large numbers of transient residents have created serious 
problems for the transportation sector and social life of China's 
larger cities.  Beijing JINRONG SHIBAO reported on 5 March that 60 
million peasants are "floating" among various cities.  There are an 
estimated 24 million in 23 cities with populations exceeding one 
million.  These travelers have aggravated the strain on transport 
facilities.  Since mid-February, railroads have been carrying 3.5 
million passengers daily nationwide.  Besides creating monumental 
traffic jams, this "60-million-strong floating block" has further 
worsened the already deteriorating infrastructure of urban areas, 
"forcing cities with 1960s facilities to serve the needs of the 
1990s."  It has also intensified the shortage of food, energy, 
water, and postal services. 

   While many peasants have picked up heavy, dirty, and other odd 
jobs, others have become thieves, robbers, prostitutes, and drug 
dealers.  Some peasants, the JINRONG SHIBAO article stated, have 
even engaged selling humans.  Three hundred women have reportedly 
been abducted from a labor market in Chengdu and sold to eight 
different provinces.  According to statistics, the floating 
population committed one-third of all crimes in Beijing in 1993.  In 
the busier commercial areas, 80 percent of all crimes were committed 
by "outsiders."  The article also noted that with numerous "black 
children" (children without birth certificates) among the floating 
population, the mandatory family planning policy is hard to enforce. 
A survey shows that 66.7 percent of all pregnancies among the 
floating population were in violation of the family planning policy, 
and 40 percent of the families have two or more children. 

   By contrast, the CHING CHI TAO PAO article emphasized the 
positive influence of the labor migration, saying it has created 
wealth for the poorer provinces.  In 1993, five million Anhui 
citizens worked outside the province.  Based on an average income of 
$172, these people earned $839 million.  In Sichuan, $270 million 
was remitted to their families by the 5.1 million who worked in 
other provinces in the first six months of 1993.  Moreover, many 
workers, after learning various trades and technology and saving 
enough money, have come home and opened their own businesses. 
Furthermore, the migrating rural laborers have contributed to the 
cities' prosperity by providing cheap labor.  Peasants make up 50 
percent of Shenzhen's labor force, for instance.  Many of the 
conveniences of city life are due to the services these rural 
laborers provide.  The article further noted that the rural labor 
migration has had a more profound influence, giving peasants a 
chance to participate in economic development.  Peasants, who 
comprise 80 percent of China's population, are no longer "excluded" 
from the process of modernization.  The article predicted that after 
undergoing the "baptism" of urban civilization, they will become a 
positive force speeding modernization. 

   Foreign Trade and Investment - Foreign-Funded Holding Companies 
Seen As Rising Trend -- Despite the lack of clear rules governing 
their operations, China is seeing growing interest among foreign 
investors in the use of umbrella companies to oversee rapidly 
expanding businesses.  A report by accounting firm Deloitte Touche 
Tohmatsu said this rising interest was demonstrated by an increase 
in applications to the Ministry of Foreign Trade and Economic 
Cooperation (MOFTEC) and the State Administration of Industry and 
Commerce (SAIC)--the main bodies governing foreign investment--to 
set up China holding companies.  About 30 foreign investors have 
established holding companies, which could easily be elevated to 
regional headquarters for their China operations as investments 
became more substantial.  Because the establishment of holding 
companies is a new trend, there are no published regulations 
governing their operation, which means that under corporate law they 
are treated as foreign-invested enterprises rather than as a 
distinct class of company.  MOFTEC takes into account three criteria 
in assessing an application.  The potential foreign investors should 
have at least three existing or planned foreign-invested enterprises 
on the mainland, registered capital investment of at least $10 
million for the holding company, and the status of a multinational- 
known entity.  Because these are only internal guidelines, certain 
foreign investors have been permitted to set up holding companies 
even though they did not meet all three criteria.  As applications 
increase, MOFTEC and SAIC have indicated that the prerequisites may 
be more rigorously enforced. 

   Holding companies are set up more for operational and 
administrative convenience than for tax advantages.  Currency swaps 
and working capital transfers among subsidiaries can be regulated to 
allow greater efficiency, and a "one-company" corporate image could 
be promoted.  For tax purposes, a holding company is treated as a 
foreign-invested enterprise and is entitled to a reinvestment 
refund.  Under Chinese law, part of the income tax paid by a 
foreign-invested enterprise is refunded to the company if it 
reinvests its profits in China for at least five years.  Profits 
distributed to the holding company in the form of dividends are 
exempt from Chinese taxes, which, in effect, means profits of 
subsidiaries are not taxed twice.  The holding company, however, 
does not enjoy the tax holiday of two years income tax exemption and 
three subsequent years of a 50-percent reduction because it is not 
considered a productive enterprise.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING 
POST (BUSINESS POST) 3 May 94 p 4) 

   Almost 12,000 Foreign-Funded Enterprises Approved in First 
Quarter -- According to information disclosed by relevant 
departments, China approved the establishment of 11,834 new foreign- 
funded enterprises from January through March of this year, with an 
agreed-upon foreign capital of $19.6 billion and actual use of 
$5.229 billion.  The number of foreign-funded enterprises going into 
operation this year is expected to increase sharply.  The latest 
statistics show that foreign-funded enterprises in China total over 
186,000.  The total output value of these enterprises was 300 
billion yuan in 1993, accounting for 11 percent of the country's 
gross industrial output value.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 0629 
GMT 29 Apr 94) 

   Power Sector Official on Foreign Funding Needs, Limitations -- 
Although China is reviewing its cap on the rate of return of power 
projects, it cannot guarantee that the ceiling will be raised to 
match those of other countries.  "Foreign investors investing in 
power projects will definitely find that there is money to be made 
as there is a great shortage of power on the mainland," said Yan 
Qin, director of the China Electricity Council.  "But we cannot 
promise that the rate of return will be higher than what it is now." 

   Mr. Yan's comments apparently were prompted by recent complaints 
from foreign investment banks and construction firms over the caps 
on the amount of profit they can make on power projects.  Foreign 
investors allege that the country's central planners have laid down 
unpublished guidelines for power projects, including a limit on 
returns of between 12 and 15 percent.  The investors argue that a 
more reasonable rate of return would be 15 to 18 percent. 

   Yesterday, Mr. Yan said that foreign investors would also have to 
take into account China's concerns before asking for higher returns. 
"We also put in money and land for power projects, so we also have 
to take into account our interest.  What this means is that power 
ventures will have to be mutually beneficial," he said.  To meet the 
country's massive power needs, China would need HK$25 billion in 
foreign funds, accounting for 25 percent of investment in power 
construction in the next seven years.  Mr. Yan said to meet these 
capital needs, the country would also turn to the World Bank, the 
Asian Development Bank, and the Japan Overseas Cooperation Fund for 
loans and export credits.  The country will also encourage foreign 
investment and will funds through flotation of power companies 
abroad.  (Hong Kong SOUTH CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 6 May 
94 p 1) 

   Australia's National Mutual Insurance Sets Up Office in Beijing 
-- National Mutual, Australia's second largest life insurance 
underwriter, opened a representative office in Beijing recently as a 
step toward expanding its operations in China.  In 1992, National 
Mutual (Asia) became the first and only life insurance underwriter 
listed on the Hong Kong stock exchange.  The company's income 
derived from insurance premiums totaled HK$3.4 billion last year. 
(Beijing ZHONGGUO XINWEN SHE 0655 GMT 5 May 94) 

   German, Dutch Companies To Build Oil-Gas Storage Facility in 
Zhuhai -- On 27 April, the German VTG Company and the Dutch Boten 
International Company signed letters of intent with the Zhuhai port 
office to build a large oil-gas storage and transport base.  The 
investment totals $150 million.  The two firms will set up a joint 
company to launch the project.  The capacity of the oil depot will 
be 1 million cubic meters, and the land assigned for the project, 
which will be completed in three phases, measures 500,000 square 
meters.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 30 Apr 94 p b2) 

   Taiwan Group Invests $150 Million in Semiconductors, Other Areas 
-- The Taiwan Northern Telecommunications Corporation signed four 
agreements with the mainland on 27 April for major investments in 
research, development, manufacture, production, sales, and service 
of switchboards, semiconductors, and other technology.  In the next 
five years, investment by the Northern Telecommunications 
Corporation will reach $150 million.  The Beijing Telecommunications 
Corporation has ordered more than 4.5 million of the company's 
switchboards.  (Hong Kong ZHONGGUO TONGXUN SHE 1011 GMT 28 Apr 94) 

   Record Number of Contracts Signed at Guangzhou Export Fair -- 
According to FUZHOU WANBAO (Fuzhou Evening News), at the 75th China 
Export Commodities Fair, which was held in Guangzhou from 15 to 30 
April, 112 representatives of Fuzhou's 12 foreign trade enterprises 
signed export contracts involving a record amount of over $30.13 
million, an increase of 35 percent and 27.3 percent respectively 
from last year's spring and autumn export commodities fair levels. 
(Fuzhou Fujian Radio 2300 GMT 8 May 94) 

   Haikou City Seeks Foreign Capital To Build New International 
Airport -- With the approval of the State Council and the Central 
Military Commission, Haikou City will start building Meilan 
International Airport at Lingshan, 15 km from the city center, 
toward the end of this year.  After the new airport is commissioned, 
the site of the existing Haikou Airport will be redeveloped into a 
modern urban center and a financial, trade, and information hub of 
the province.  The search for foreign investment has already 
started.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 5 May 94 p a6) 

   Malaysian Group Interested in Nanjing Infrastructure Projects -- 
Nanjing Vice Mayor Zhou Xuepo said the city government will 
accelerate the city's infrastructure construction, including the 
construction of a new airport, which will be completed in 1996.  A 
feasibility study is under way for the construction of the second 
Chang Jiang bridge in Nanjing.  A Malaysian financial group has 
indicated its willingness to cooperate.  This project will involve 
an investment of 3.8 billion yuan.  The State Planning Commission 
has approved the construction of a subway in Nanjing, which will 
require a total investment of 4.8 billion yuan.  Four five-star 
hotels will also be built.  (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 5 May 94 p c3) 

   Foreign-Invested Firms Key Players in Shenyang Development Zone 
-- The Shenyang Nanhu scientific and technological development zone, 
known as the "Shenyang silicon valley," which is one of the 
country's five comprehensive reform experimental zones, has so far 
introduced 210 foreign-invested enterprises, with a total foreign 
capital of $250 million.  Foreign-invested enterprises in the 
development zone account for only 15 percent of the zone's total, 
but their output value accounts for 50 percent.  In addition, an 
industrial zone was built early last year south of the Hui He.  More 
than 600 businessmen from 15 countries and regions in the world have 
come to this zone to sign contracts and agreements on building 
industrial groups, bonded warehouses, and electronics centers. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 3 May 94 p 25) 

   Foreign Investors Now Free To Form Real Estate Companies in 
Shanghai -- At a press conference on 3 May in Hong Kong, an official 
from the Shanghai Municipal Real Estate Administration said that 
foreign investors are now allowed to establish real estate 
development companies in Shanghai.  However, they must register with 
the Shanghai authorities for land utility approval before they form 
companies.  Early this year, the Shanghai Municipal Government 
formally approved foreign investors' request to build residential 
buildings for domestic sales.  (Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 4 May 94 p 5) 

   Hong Kong Company Claims Mainland Investments of HK$30 Billion -- 
Huang Hua, chairman of the Nanfang International Group, says that 
the group now has more than 40 investment projects on the mainland, 
with investments in excess of HK$30 billion.  In the future, the 
group will increase its holdings of Guangzhou real estate, as well 
as real estate developments in cities in eastern and northern 
Guangdong.  Huang also said the company would increase its 
investments in the tertiary sector. (Hong Kong WEN WEI PO 30 Apr 94 
p C3) 

   Sun Hung Kai Adopts 'Prudent Strategy' on Mainland Investment -- 
Sun Hung Kai Properties, one of Hong Kong's largest real estate 
groups, has stated that it is adopting a "prudent strategy" with 
regard to investments in China.  A company spokesman said the HK$4 
billion figure cited previously for three projects in Guangzhou 
referred to the total cost of these developments.  As these projects 
were being run as joint ventures, Sun Hung Kai exposure was 
significantly less than HK$4 billion.  The spokesman said Sun Hung 
Kai would continue with its policy of keeping its investment 
exposure in China to less than 10 percent of its total assets. 
While Guangzhou New Town Plaza is a joint venture with Guangzhou 
Investment and China Overseas Land and Investment, the group's 
biggest mainland project is the HK$2.3 billion redevelopment of 
Dongan Market in Beijing.  The spokesman said future investments 
would focus on Beijing, Shanghai, and Guangzhou.  (Hong Kong SOUTH 
CHINA MORNING POST (BUSINESS POST) 12 May 94 p 3) 

   Hong Kong, UK Investors Set Up Guangzhou Electronics Plant -- 
Upsonic, a joint venture between the Wong family of Hong Kong and UK 
merchant bank Kleinwort Benson's China Investment Development Fund, 
has set up an electronics factory in Guangzhou.  Guangzhou Vice 
Mayor Liu Jinxiang and former British ambassador to China Sir Percy 
Cradock attended the 26 April opening ceremony.  Initial investment 
will be $8 million, increasing to $16 million by the end of 1994. 
(Hong Kong TA KUNG PAO 27 Apr 94 p 29) 

   Beijing Municipality Brings in $2 Billion in Foreign Investments 
-- Beijing Municipality has acquired more investments for industrial 
production from noted companies and corporations from Japan, the 
United States, Germany, the Netherlands, and Switzerland.  By 1993, 
more than 40 industrial enterprises across the municipality had 
acquired $2.08 billion in foreign investment.  In 1993, enterprises 
in the municipality signed contracts on 246 projects that involved 
$1.47 billion in foreign investment.  In early 1994, these 
industrial enterprises signed agreements on more than 50 joint- 
venture projects that involved $2 billion in foreign investment. 
(Beijing BEIJING RIBAO 5 May 94 p 1) 

   Beijing Makes $225 Million in Export Deals at Guangzhou Trade 
Fair -- The Beijing Municipal Trade Delegation, composed of 
representatives from 48 foreign trade enterprises and 10 foreign- 
funded enterprises, has scored unprecedented achievements at the 
75th China Export Trade Fair held in Guangzhou.  The total volume of 
export deals made at the trade fair reached $225.1 million, a 29.4- 
percent increase over the target set by the municipality and a 
117.1-percent increase over 1993.  (Beijing BEIJING RIBAO 4 May 94 p 
1) 

   Dalian's Achievements in Economic Opening -- Since its opening to 
the outside world, Liaoning's Dalian City has boldly utilized 
foreign funds and imported technologies to renovate more than 100 
large and medium-sized state-owned enterprises.  As a result, a 
great deal of key equipment has entered the world markets, and more 
than 40 percent of its machinery and electrical products have 
attained international standards.  The volume of exports and import 
substitutes in the past 10 years totaled $750 million.  Over the 
past 10 years, Dalian has attracted investors from 46 countries and 
regions.  Last year, the annual output value of the 1,400 foreign- 
invested enterprises already in operation reached 10 billion yuan. 
These enterprises created $900 million in foreign exchange and 600 
million yuan in profit and tax.  Last year, the total output value 
of township and town enterprises in Dalian City amounted to 30.7 
billion yuan, accounting for 50 percent of the city's total 
industrial output value.  (Shenyang Liaoning People's Radio 1000 GMT 
6 May 94) 

   Qingdao Reports Volume of Foreign Capital Over Last 10 Years -- 
Since 1984, Qingdao City in Shandong Province has approved 2,625 
projects involving foreign capital.  The actual volume of foreign 
capital involved in these projects reached $1.69 billion.  In 1993, 
the city's total volume of imports and exports reached $1.388 
billion, its total industrial output value showed a 420-percent 
increase over the figure recorded in 1984, and its financial 
revenues a 180-percent increase.  (Jinan Shandong People's Radio 
2300 GMT 3 May 94) 

   Shandong Chemical Company Forms Joint Venture With German Firm -- 
Qingdao Degusa Chemical Corporation, China's largest carbon black 
production enterprise, was formally established in Jiaozhou on 21 
April.  The investment in this corporation totals $55 million.  The 
corporation is a joint venture bewteen the Qingdao Zhenya Carbon 
Black Group Company, Germany's Degusa Corporation, and Germany's 
Investment and Development Corporation.  (Jinan DAZHONG RIBAO 26 Apr 
94 p 2) 

   Taiwan:  Economics Minister Proposes Method To Protect Investment 
in Mainland -- Delivering a speech in Taichung on 30 April, Economic 
Minister Chiang Ping-kun said establishing a foreign trade 
association on the mainland in the name of a ROC-Japan joint venture 
may be a way to seek protection of Taiwan investment there.  He said 
it is not possible for Taiwan to set up branches of the Foreign 
Trade Association of Taiwan because the mainland side had made it 
clear that if Taiwan sets up trade association branches there, it 
will set up similar branches on Taiwan.  It will not be possible to 
solve this political question within the foreseeable future, he 
noted.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 1 May 94 p 2) 

   Growth in Exports to PRC Via Hong Kong Slow -- The mainland 
retrenchment policy has slowed Taiwan's exports there. According to 
Hong Kong Customs statistics, Taiwan's exports to the mainland via 
Hong Kong totaled $1.217 billion in the first two months of this 
year, an  increase of four percent over the same period last year. 
However, the growth rate was smaller than that of the previous two 
years. (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 30 Apr 94 p 6) 

   Ban on Imports of Japanese Wine, Cigarettes May Be Lifted for 
GATT -- The Ministry of Finance has initially decided to lift the 
ban on imports of Japanese cigarettes and wine to comply with GATT 
principles.  However, the ministry may lift the ban gradually in 
order to safeguard the health of citizens and protect farmers.  The 
Republic of China and Japan are scheduled to hold bilateral 
consultations in August in connection with Taiwan's application to 
join GATT.  Japan is expected to demand the lifting of the ban on 
the import of Japanese cigarettes and wine.  An official of the 
ministry said the lifting of the ban will seriously affect the sale 
of cigarettes made in Taiwan.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 25 Apr 94 p 
1) 

   Tariffs on 758 Products Being Reduced or Eliminated -- The 
Customs Tariff Rate Committee under the Ministry of Finance on 29 
April adopted the draft amendment of the customs import tariff 
regulations for 1994.  The amendment reduces import tariffs for 758 
products, including refrigerators, washing machines, yellow beans, 
agricultural machinery, feed, farm insecticides, perfumes, 
lipsticks, and toothbrushes, by an average of 2.81 percent.  The 
tariff on 15 products, including stone materials and anticancer 
drugs, will be eliminated.  The current tariff amendment will lower 
the average rate from the 4.99 that existed at the end of 1993 to 
4.69  percent.  The rate for agricultural products will drop from 
11.55 percent to 11.01 percent, and that of industrial products from 
4.35  to 4.26 percent.  (Taipei CHING-CHI JIH-PAO 30 Apr 94 p 2) 

   SOUTH KOREA:  FEATURE:  Supreme Court, Patent Office Propose New 
Patent Trial System -- SUMMARY:  In April the Supreme Court and the 
Office of Patent Administration each made proposals for revising the 
ROK's patent trial system, the ROK press reported.  The Supreme 
Court's proposal has generated criticism and concern that the 
court's proposed revisions may create an impression that the ROK is 
"hesitant to protect patents."  Debate over the issue of revising 
the patent trial system is  "heated," and groups are working to 
protect their "livelihood." 

   According to the 20 April TONGA ILBO, the current patent trial 
system involves three offices and as many as three trials:  The 
Office of Patent Administration's Trial Office handles the first 
trial, its Appeals Office the second trial, and the Supreme Court 
handles any third and final trial.  The 5 May CHUGAN CHOSON reported 
that the issue of revising the patent trial system arose in August 
1993, when two lawyers requested a trial before the Constitutional 
Court to determine the system's constitutionality.  The point of 
contention was whether the process adequately protected a citizen's 
right to trial.  According to the 17 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, in 
February the Supreme Court indicated that, because the process did 
not include a hearing before the High Court (an appellate court one 
level below the Supreme Court), it violated a citizen's right to 
trial and was therefore unconstitutional.  As a result, in April the 
Supreme Court announced it would submit a formal proposal to amend 
the patent trial system to the National Assembly.  CHUGAN CHOSON 
reported that the Office of Patent Administration subsequently 
announced its own formal proposal several days later. 

   The Supreme Court's proposal to amend the patent trial system 
attempts to resolve the constitutionality issue by including the 
High Court in the process.  TONGA ILBO reported that, under this 
proposal, the patent administration would still handle the first two 
trials, while the Seoul High Court would handle a third trial, and 
the Supreme Court would handle a fourth trial, if necessary.  The 
Supreme Court proposes implementing these changes in 1996.  HANGUK 
KYONGJE SINMUN noted that the Supreme Court originally wanted to 
shift responsibility for the second trial from the patent 
administration to the Seoul High Court.  However, after the patent 
administration opposed the plan, the court opted instead to simply 
add the Seoul High Court to the process.  The paper quoted a source 
affiliated with the Supreme Court as asserting that the court's 
proposed amendment was "somewhat lacking" due to "insufficient 
negotiations" with the patent administration.  However, the source 
remarked the amendment will likely be revised in committee at the 
National Assembly. 

   The issue of revising the patent trial system was discussed in a 
public forum in January (see the 9 March 1994 Pacific Rim Economic 
Review, pages 31-32), and at that time the Office of Patent 
Administration asserted that the current system was legal.  However, 
in the wake of the Supreme Court's proposal, on 19 April the patent 
administration announced its own proposal for amending the system. 
CHUGAN CHOSON reported that this amendment accepts most of the 
Supreme Court's ideas, and would use the four-trial system until 
1998.  At that time, the patent administration would combine its 
Trial Office and its Appeals Office into a single entity, the Patent 
Trial Board, which would handle the first patent trial.  The High 
Court would then handle any second trial, and the Supreme Court a 
third trial, if necessary.  According to TONGA ILBO's calculations, 
if the National Assembly passes both proposals, from 1996 to 1998 
patent holders could go through as many as four trials before 
receiving a final verdict in a patent suit.  Protecting one's patent 
rights could become more difficult under such a system, the paper 
opined. 

   Despite its limited acceptance of the proposed four-trial system, 
the patent administration is concerned about the system, according 
to HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN.  It could be harder to protect one's 
patent rights, because it could take up to five years to receive a 
final ruling on a patent suit.  The paper noted the patent 
administration's worries that adopting such a system might create 
the misunderstanding overseas that South Korea is hesitant to 
protect patents, which could generate trade friction.  According to 
the paper, Japan set up such a system in 1945, but dismantled it in 
1959 after finding it inefficient.  Some are criticizing the Supreme 
Court's amendment, which comes 40 years after Japan dismantled a 
similar law, as a "typical example of incompetent policy," HANGUK 
KYONGJE SINMUN observed. 

   The patent administration is not alone in criticizing the Supreme 
Court's proposed amendment, according to CHUGAN CHOSON.  The Korea 
Patent Attorney Association criticized the court's "unilateral 
decision" to amend the system, commenting that the court had not 
listened to the opinions of inventors or industrialists.  The 
association called for the establishment of a special patent court 
and an expert judge system similar to those in the United States and 
Europe.  CHUGAN CHOSON noted that scientists and inventors are 
calling for the immediate establishment of a court specializing in 
patent cases.  The issue of reforming the patent trial system has 
generated a "tug-of-war" and "shrill confrontation" as various 
groups--the courts, patent attorneys, and the patent administration- 
-collect opinions and propose amendments that "favor themselves," 
the journal observed.   It commented that, as intangible products 
such as patents and industrial property rights move to the fore, 
attention is focusing on how the groups' "keen competition" to 
"guarantee their own livelihood" will turn out. 

   FEATURE:  76 Core Companies Exempted From Credit Restrictions -- 
SUMMARY:  The Office of Bank Supervision has announced the names of 
companies which it will exempt from credit restrictions, according 
to ROK press reports.  This year's list includes fewer manufacturing 
firms and reflects the government's moves to include non- 
manufacturing areas as core business sectors. 

   According to the 1 April HANGUK ILBO, on 31 March the Office of 
Bank Supervision announced the names of 76 companies--subsidiaries 
of the 28 largest conglomerates--which would be exempt from credit 
restrictions, effective 1 April.  Of the 76, 55 held exempt status 
in 1993, while 21 were newly selected.  The 76 companies chosen are 
among the 108 companies designated by the 30 largest ROK 
conglomerates as their key companies. 

   According to the 1 April HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, the Office of 
Bank Supervision "readjusted" its list of core companies "based on" 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy's (MOTIE) list of key 
companies.  The paper noted that the bank office is changing its 
emphasis in order to help the government "professionalize" core 
business sectors.  The 13 April CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that the 
inclusion of more non-manufacturing companies as core companies is 
due mainly to the government's move to include distribution and 
construction as core business sectors.  The journal reported that 
among the 76 core companies are 17 chemical companies, 12 
distribution and storage firms, nine construction firms, seven car 
and transportation machinery manufacturers, six foodstuff companies, 
and six metals companies.  HANGUK ILBO noted that this year 55 
companies (72.4 percent) are in the manufacturing sector, compared 
to 63 companies (86.3 percent) in 1993.  This year, for the first 
time, Taehan Wire and Tonguk Trade Group are included in the list of 
the ROK's 30 largest conglomerates.  However, the Office of Bank 
Supervision has not yet recognized any of their subsidiaries as core 
companies.  According to HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN, this is because the 
two have not yet selected any subsidiaries as key companies under 
MOTIE.  The paper noted that, if some of the groups' subsidiaries 
are so designated with MOTIE, the Office of Bank Supervision may 
allow the groups to choose three companies as core companies exempt 
from credit restrictions. 

   HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN reported that the 30 largest conglomerates 
have 573 domestic subsidiaries, 492 of which are subject to credit 
restrictions.  (The remaining 81 are exempt from such restrictions 
because they are either core companies or high-performing stock 
dispersing companies.)  The Office of Bank Supervision will limit 
the share of credit allotted to the 492 non-exempt subsidiaries to 
10.79 percent of the total credit available, compared to 10.93 
percent in 1993.  Moreover, the subsidiaries in this category that 
belong to the five largest conglomerates will be limited to no more 
than 5.89 percent of the total credit available, compared to 6.15 
percent in 1993.  HANGUK KYONGJE SINMUN noted that, at the end of 
1993, subsidiaries with credit restrictions accounted for 12,861.9 
billion won ($16.08 billion), or 8.28 percent, of total loans the 
office monitors. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG noted that, from a conglomerate's point of view, 
a core company enjoys privileges that can enable it to revitalize 
its investments and improve its development.  However, recently 
banks have been strengthening their credit inspections and using 
their "extremely weak financial powers" with regard to awarding core 
company status.  The banks are "leery of" including an insolvent 
enterprise as a core company.  In the future, when a group's main 
correspondent bank opposes designating a  financially weak 
subsidiary as a core company, the government will not "help" the 
group win that designation from the bank.  Thus, groups' "thin 
tactics" of setting up a debt-laden enterprise as a core company and 
then "throwing away" its financial benefits will not "turn out as 
they wish." 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG commented that a group's management strategy and 
investment expansion will differ depending on which subsidiaries it 
has designated as core companies.  For example, Hyundai Group has 
named Hyundai Oil Refinery as a core company, in lieu of Hyundai 
Petrochemicals.  Hyundai chose its oil refinery as a core company 
because the group has completed most of its basic investment in 
petrochemicals, and now needs more than 1 trillion won ($1.25 
billion) to increase its refining capacity by 300 percent by 1995. 
The competition in oil refining is expected to actually intensify, 
because four of the five largest oil refiners (Honam Oil Refinery is 
excluded) have all been named as core companies.  Another example is 
Daewoo, which selected only two subsidiaries as core companies, and 
in lieu of a third chose to register two of its subsidiaries--Daewoo 
and Daewoo Telecom--as high-performing stock dispersing companies. 
CHUGAN MAEGYONG explained that a high-performing stock dispersing 
company is not only exempt from credit restrictions, but also from 
regulations regarding "self-financing" to cover real estate 
acquisitions and enterprise investments.  In order to register the 
two subsidiaries as high-performing stock dispersing companies, the 
group sold off shares to reduce its stock interest in the two to 
less than 8 percent.  Yet a third example is Halla Group.  Its goal 
of targeting the automobile market can be seen in its choice of 
Halla Cooperative, its car parts firm, as a core company. 

                           Designated Core Companies 

   Samsung:  Samsung Chemical Corporation, Samsung Heavy Industries, 
   Samsung Electronics 
   Hyundai:  Hyundai Oil Refinery, Hyundai Electronics Industry, 
   Hyundai Motor 
   Daewoo:  Daewoo Shipbuilding and Heavy Machinery, Daewoo Motor 
   Lucky-Goldstar:   Lucky, Goldstar, Goldstar Electron 
   Hanjin:  Hanjin Heavy Industries, KAL, Hanjin Construction 
   Kia:  Asia Motors, Kia Machine Tool, Kia Steel 
   Sunkyong: Yukong, SKC, Sunkyong Industry 
   Ssangyong:  Ssangyong Oil Refining, Ssangyong Cement Industrial, 
   Ssangyong Motor 
   Daelim: Daelim Ceramic, Daelim Concrete 
   Hanil:  Hanil Synthetic Fiber, Kyungnam Wool Textile Industries, 
Hanhyo Construction 
   Hanhwa: Kyung-In Energy, Hanyang Chemical, Hanhwa 
   Kumho:  Kumho, Kumho Petrochemicals, Asiana Airlines 
   Doosan: Oriental Brewery, Doosan Beverage, Doosan Construction 
   Dongkuk Steel Mill:  Dongkuk Steel Mill, Yonhap Steel, Korea 
   Steel 
   Hyosung:  Tongyang Nylon, Tongyang Polyester, Hyosung Heavy 
   Industries 
   Lotte:  Lotte Confectionary, Honam Petrochemical, Lotte Shopping 
   Sammi:  Sammi Steel, Sammi 
   Koryo Synthetic:  Koryo Synthetic, Koryo Petrochemical, Kohap, 
   Inc. 
   Kolon:  Kolon, Kolon Chemical, Kolon International 
   Halla:  Mando Machinery, Halla Cooperative 
   Haitai: Haitai Distribution, Haitai International 
   Dong-ah Construction:  Dong-ah Construction, Daehan Shipping 
   Woo-sung Construction:  Woo-sung Construction, Woo-sung 
   Distribution 
   Dongbu:  Dongbu Steel, Dongbu Industrial, Dongbu Rapid Transit 
   Kukdong Construction:  Kukdong Ceramics, Kukdong Construction 
   Kukje 
   General Construction 
   Byucksan:  Byucksan, Byucksan Construction, Byucksan Development 
   Taehan Wire:  none designated yet 
   Tongguk Trading:  none designated yet 
   Jinro:  Jinro, Jinro General Foods 
   Samyang:  Sunhill Glucose, Samnam Petrochemical, Samyang Co. 

   FEATURE:  ROK Public Database Project Moves Forward -- SUMMARY: 
South Korea's public database development project, one of three 
projects addressed in the Ministry of Communications' omnibus 
program to promote the development and use of electronic databases, 
has completed its initial stage of theme selection, according to 
Seoul press reports.  Korea Telecom will now solicit outside bids to 
build these particular databases.  Meanwhile, a Ministry of Science 
and Technology research institute is developing a database service 
system to facilitate management of high-speed data transfer and to 
systematize multimedia applications. 

   The ROK government's public database development project took a 
"big step forward" with the selection of 93 "development themes" by 
the Public Database Development Promotion Council, the 15 April 
Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN (MKS) reported.  Some 45 percent of the 
themes pertain to economics and industry, 30 percent to academic 
fields and education, and 15 percent to daily living.  The remaining 
10 percent focus on miscellaneous themes such as government 
administration and election data.  According to the newspaper, the 
economics and industry themes include national statistics, 
information on the North America Free Trade Association and the 
Uruguay Round, and data on agricultural products, distribution, 
construction, transportation, and computer software.  Academic 
fields will include data on library holdings, science and 
technology, and the social sciences. 

   MKS reported the "next step" is for the Ministry of 
Communications to "prioritize" the database themes and pass this 
guidance onto Korea Telecom, which in June will solicit proposals 
from private companies to develop the databases.  The ministry 
reportedly has budgeted 80 billion won ($100 million) for use on the 
project between now and 1997.  According to the 21 March Seoul 
CHONJA SINMUN, this "public database" is one of three such state- 
supported projects, which also include "government-funded databases" 
and the database industry in general.  The three projects were 
reported by the newspaper to be directed by the Korea Database 
Promotion Center (DPC) in accordance with the Ministry of 
Communication's 1993 policy on database promotion.  The "Public 
Database Development Promotion Council" mentioned in the MKS report 
presumably is an appendage of the DPC. 

   In what appears to be a related development, the 15 April MKS 
reported in a separate article that the Computer Research Group of 
the Electronics and Telecommunications Research Institute (ETRI, an 
ROK government-funded institute under the control of the Ministry of 
Science and Technology) has begun work on a "database service 
system" with a 5 billion won ($6.25 million) budget that also runs 
from 1994 to 1997.  The service system is reportedly based on 
technology used for ETRI's "Pada I and II" database management 
systems developed in 1991-92, and will be used to develop a 
"management system for use in a high-speed data communications net." 

   ETRI's project also involves building a "multimedia applications 
system development tool," and a "database structure tool" needed for 
multimedia database service.  The institute expects these systems 
will form the "basic core" for high-speed communications services 
(such as electronic libraries, "hop shopping," and video-by-order) 
and for augmenting existing services.  They will also help 
"systematize" technology used with domestic database management 
systems. 

   FEATURE:  ROK High-Speed Information Highway Project Described -- 
SUMMARY:  A Seoul business magazine has published a detailed 
breakdown with budget figures of South Korea's high-speed 
information highway project.  Scheduled to run until 2015, the 
project envisions spending $56 billion on a national data 
communications net for government use, a separate public data 
communications net, and applications and core technology.  The 
system will connect all parts of the country with high-capacity 
optical electronic cables able to handle such next-generation 
communications services as 3-D conferencing, parallel database 
searches, multimedia applications, and high-definition television 
(HDTV). 

   South Korea has begun building a high-speed information highway 
of its own called the "Super High-Speed Data Communications Net." 
According to the 13 April Seoul CHUGAN MAEGYONG, basic plans for the 
project were laid down last August by the ROK's Ministry of 
Communications, and the go-ahead for full-scale development was 
given by the Blue House in January.  The magazine reported that the 
project is under the control of a "promotion committee" headed by 
the country's prime minister, which in turn presides over a "working 
level committee" of some 25 officials on the bureau chief- level 
from related government agencies.  A "planning group" has also been 
established in the Ministry of Communications to coordinate the 
project.  The ministry's plan reportedly calls for simultaneous work 
in three areas: a super high-speed national data communications net, 
a super high-speed public data communications net, and development 
of applications and core technology.  Each program has three stages 
with separate budgeting for each stage. 

   For the national net, stage one is from 1994-97 and envisions 
dividing South Korea into five jurisdictions--metropolitan Seoul, 
the central region, the Honam area, Pusan, and Taegu--where basic 
construction will be carried out separately, CHUGAN MAEGYONG 
reported.  During this stage, "the entire country including medium 
and small cities" will be connected by an optical cable network 
capable of 155-162 megabits per second providing data service to 
national agencies, local government bodies, and research institutes. 
Existing administrative, national defense, public security, 
education, and all other public computer networks will be 
incorporated into the system.  Stage two is from 1998-2001, during 
which a 2.5 gigabit per second (GBPS) optical cable and "next 
generation" ATM (asynchronous transmission mode) switching system 
exchange will be built.  Services will include remote medical 
examination and treatment, education, and electronic libraries. 
Stage three from 2003 to 2010 involves building optical cable links 
with several tens of GBPS capacity for use with three-dimensional 
image conferencing and parallel searching of dispersed databases. 

   CHUGAN MAEGYONG also described the "public data communications 
net" project aimed at building a broad-band integrated system 
digital network (B-ISDN).  Stage one from 1994 to 1997 will expand 
present ISDN services.  Stage two continues until 2002, during which 
time "model ATM switching nets" will be built in the large city 
areas while 10 GBPS optical electronic transmission equipment will 
be provided for various high-tech communications services.  The 
third stage runs until 2015 and involves installing 100 GBPS 
equipment for use with optical cables to provide household 
subscribers with multimedia and HDTV services. 

   The application core technology component's three stages are 
coterminous with those of the public data communications project. 
In stage one, ATM switching and optical communications equipment 
will be developed.  During the second stage, an information 
processing system that can be used with digital HDTV will be built. 
An advanced "next generation" version will be developed in the third 
stage.  In addition, a "multifunction advance model network" will be 
built and operated between Seoul and Taedok science town to 
expedite applications and technology development and to maximize 
research results."  The network initially will have a 2.5 GBPS 
capacity, which will be upgraded to 10 GBPS and finally to a "T- 
class" super high-speed net. 

   According to CHUGAN MAEGYONG, the Ministry of Communications will 
submit a 44.77 trillion won ($56 billion) budget for the project to 
the South Korean National Assembly (figures in billion won.  800 won 
= $1): 


               Super High-Speed National Data Communications Net 
                       (funding:  government finance and 
                             proceeds from sales) 
Project/Stage                 1        2         3          Subtotal 

Build a high-speed trunk net  153.7    161.1     277.2      547.0 
Operate high-speed trunk net   19.1     71.5     178.4      269.0 
Build prototype test net       12.9     17.6      30.5       61.0 
Model projects                 14.0      -                   14.0 

Totals                        199.7    205.2     486.1      891.0 

                Super High-speed Public Data Communications Net 
                         (funding:  private business) 

Project/Stage                1         2         3          Subtotal 

Build optical cables          423.9    2,851.9   28,247.1  31,522.9 
Build communications net      143.8      947.0    9,436.7  10,527.5 

Totals                        567.7    3,798.9   37,683.8  42,050.4 

                 Applications and Core Technology Development 
            (funding:  government finance and proceeds from sales) 

Project/Stage                 1        2         3          Subtotal 

Applications development       52.0     70.0     100.0        222.0 
Core technology development   796.0    321.7     496.6      1,614.3 

Totals                        848.0    391.7     596.6      1,836.3 



   KAIST Establishes Optical-Electronics Research Center -- A new 
optical-electronics research center is being established within the 
Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology (KAIST) for 
research in optical communications and to build a foundation for an 
optical electronics industry.  The center will carry out 
concentrated research on components for optical information 
processing, a next-generation optical transmission module and 
optical network, and fibre-optics materials.  Some 1.2 billion won 
($1.5 million) will be spent by the center annually between now and 
1996 to commercialize one (unspecified) optical-electronics product, 
1.5 billion won ($1.875 million) annually from 1997 to 1999 for two 
more products, and 2.0 billion ($2.5 million) annually between 2000 
and 2002 to commercialize three more products.  The research is 
expected to yield some 62 patents or theses by 2002.  KAIST's center 
will serve as the nucleus for coordinated research that ultimately 
will involve South Korean universities, research institutes, and 
commercial firms.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Apr 94 p 14) 

   ROK Restructuring State-Funded S and T Research Institutes -- The 
South Korean government is completely restructuring its 27 science 
and technology research institutes and affiliated organizations by 
merging some and abolishing or selling others, in order to eliminate 
"inefficiency and bureaucratism" standing in the way of S and T 
development.  According to an "informed source," the Korea 
Electrotechnology Research Institute is among those to be sold.  A 
"fair number" of institutes will be subordinated to national 
agencies, while still others will have their functions changed to 
training S and T personnel, as is now done by the Korea Advanced 
Institute of Science and Technology (KAIST). 

   At present, there are 13 government-funded institutes subordinate 
to the Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST), and one each under 
the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy (MOTIE), the Ministry of 
Health and Social Affairs, the Ministry of Construction, and the 
Ministry of Communications.  Ten others are "affiliated institutes." 
The 27 institutes employ 7,237 people, and are receiving 375.5 
billion won ($469.4 million) in government funds for 1994.  The 
institutes and their present affiliations are: 

                     State-funded R and D institutes under 

A. Ministry of Science and Technology 
      1. Korea Institute of Science and Technology 
             a. System Engineering Research Institute 
             b. Genetic Engineering Research Institute 
             c. Research and Development Information Center 
             d. Science and Technology Policy Institute 
             e. Management Research Institute 
      2. Korea Advanced Institute of Science and Technology 
      3. Korea Research Institute of Standards and Science 
             a. National Astronomical Observatory 
             b. Basic Science Support Center 
      4. Korea Institute of Machinery and Metals 
             a. Korea Aerospace Research Institute 
      5. Korea Institute of Nuclear Safety 
      6. Korea Atomic Energy Research Institute 
             a. Atomic Energy Hospital 
             b. Atomic Energy Environment Management Center 
      7. Korea Institute of Energy Research 
      8. Korea Institute of Geology, Mining, and Materials 
      9. Korea Electrotechnology Research Institute 
      10. Korea Research Institute of Ships and Ocean Engineering 
      11. Korea Research Institute of Chemical Technology 
      12. Korea Science and Engineering Foundation 
      13. Kwangju Institute of Science and Technology 

B. Ministry of Trade, Industry, Energy 
      14. Production Technology Research Institute 
C. Ministry of Health and Social Affairs 
      15. Food Development Research Institute 
D. Ministry of Construction 
      16. Construction Technology Research Institute 
E. Ministry of Communications 
      17. Electronics and Telecommunications Research Institute 

(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 12 Apr 94 p 1) 

   ROK Scientific and Technological Research 'Stagnating' -- South 
Korea's S and T research, as measured by articles published in 
world-famous scholarly journals by ROK science-related institutes 
(including state-funded research institutes, universities, and 
private research labs) remained stagnant during 1993, according to 
the Korea Institute of Industry and Technology Information (KINITI). 
South Korea's total of 3,129 articles ranked 35th worldwide, "behind 
even such countries as Brazil, Taiwan, and the Republic of South 
Africa."  The number represents only 0.5 percent of the world total 
of science-related articles published that year, compared to the 
United States with 39.1 percent, Japan with 7.8 percent, and England 
with 7.7 percent.  KINITI blamed the ROK's poor showing on the 
"absence of an S and T policy," and the "lazy" manner in which 
government-funded research institutes are operated.  Of the 3,129 
South Korean articles, 583 were prepared by the Korea Advanced 
Institute of Science and Technology, 559 by Seoul National 
University, 156 by Postech, 149 by Yonsei University, 130 by the 
Korea Institute of Science and Technology, and 105 by Pusan 
University.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 31 Mar 94 p 14) 

   Government Views Post-"G7" Advanced S and T Projects -- The ROK 
Ministry of Science and Technology (MOST) is working on a "Long-Term 
Plan for Science and Technology Development Aimed at the Year 2010" 
to take South Korea beyond the present "Highly Advanced National" 
(HAN) projects (also known as "G7") scheduled to be completed in 
2001.  The ministry and the (quasi-independent) Science and 
Technology Policy Institute (which has responsibility for the "G7" 
projects) will hold public hearings this June to determine the 
specific projects to be included in the new plan.  Project selection 
will take place against the backdrop of long-term technology 
forecasts that extend to the year 2015. 

   Post-"G7" planning assumes the "G7" projects now underway will 
have greatly raised the level of ROK technology.  By the year 2001, 
the ROK government will have invested 1.47 trillion won ($1.84 
billion), government-invested agencies 0.59 trillion ($0.74 
billion), and private industry 1.64 trillion won ($2.05 billion) in 
the 11 HAN projects now being developed.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 6 Apr 94 p 13) 

   ROK Government Biotech Research Funding for 1994 -- South Korea's 
Ministry of Science and Technology will spend 34 billion won ($42.5 
million) on biotech research in 1994, some 55 percent more than last 
year's amount of 21.9 billion won ($27.3 million).  The breakdown by 
category is as follows (figures in billion won ($ million)): 

   10.8 ($13.5) Develop new biological materials. 
   0.8   ($1.0) Develop new medicines and agricultural chemicals. 
   3.0   ($3.8) Genome research, research on anatomical functions, 
                develop commercial biological products,agricultural 
                technology, new technology for diagnosing and 
                preventing illnesses, medical engineering 
   2.4   ($3.0) R and D conducted at the Genetic Engineering 
                Research Institute. 
   1.5   ($1.9) Korean Institute of Science and Technology's medical 
                science projects. 
   3.0   ($3.8) "Other research agencies connected with biological 
                engineering." 
   8.0  ($10.0) 12 research centers involved in biotech research. 
   4.5   ($5.6) R and D projects related to bioengineering within 
                basic, goal-directed research projects. 

(Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 14 Apr 94 p 14) 

   MOST to Oversee Patent Applications for Affiliated Institutes -- 
The Ministry of Science and Technology is devising "support 
policies" to protect ministry affiliated research institutes from 
unauthorized use of their research results domestically and 
internationally.  Although many such institutes have been performing 
research with a high probability of commercialization, the 
complicated procedures and expense of applying for patent 
protection has caused the institutes to ignore this precaution.  It 
costs some 5 million won ($625,000) per country to apply for 
overseas patents, plus an annual maintenance fee of 200,000-300,000 
won ($250-375) per country per item.  Many ministry-affiliated 
institutes also lack the expertise needed to apply for patents 
abroad.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 15 Apr 94 p 19) 

   High-Level 'Semiconductor Equipment Council' Formed -- A 
Semiconductor Equipment Council was formally inaugurated to oversee 
an investment of 50 billion won ($62.5 million) over the next four 
years to "indigenize" semiconductor manufacturing equipment.  Kim 
Chi-rak, vice-director of the Semiconductor Industry Association, 
was elected head of the Council at its first meeting on 8 March. 
The Council's other members are Kim Ik-man (chief, Semiconductor 
Department, Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy), Choe Chang-ho 
(managing director, Samsung Electronics), Yun Chong-se (director, 
Goldstar Electron), Yi Hyon-hui (managing director, Hyundai 
Electronics), and Chong Kyong-jun (chief, Evaluation and Control, 
Korea Academy of Industrial Technology). 
   The Council will determine the basic direction that 
"indigenization" of semiconductor equipment will take, including 
what particular items will be singled out for indigenization and 
what businesses will be selected to participate.  The South Korean 
government is providing 20 billion won ($25 million) in subsidies to 
the project, including 4 billion won ($5 million) from its 
Industrial Development fund and 16 billion won ($20 million) in 
basic industrial technology support funds.  Samsung, Goldstar, and 
Hyundai are supplying 10 billion won ($12.5 million) each.  (Seoul 
CHONJA SINMUN 10 Mar 94 p 1) 

   ROK-PRC 'Technomart' Held in Beijing -- An "ROK-PRC 
technomart"opened in Beijing on 4 April representing the "largest 
scale cooperative undertaking between South Korea and China since 
relations were established" in 1992.  Some 138 technologies are 
being offered to China and 434 to South Korea.  The ROK delegation 
included 109 members of conglomerates and small-medium businesses, 
led by the Ministry of Trade, Industry, and Energy's(MOTIE's) 
Planning and Management Office director.  Chinese participants 
numbered 600.  Of the South Korean firms, 49 wanted to import PRC 
technology, 4 sought to transfer technology, and another 5 wanted to 
do both.  The following is a breakdown by category: 


                                               from 
                   TECHNOLOGY               PRC     ROK 
                   machinery                126      38 
                   metallurgy                21      21 
                   chemical engineering      70      31 
                   electronics               66      14 
                   medical service           43       6 
                   medicinal herbs           36      13 
                   light industry            30       5 
                   agriculture               30       5 
                   environment               30       5 
                   Totals                   434     138 



This is the first opportunity MOTIE has had to make an objective 
analysis of the Chinese technologies, an opportunity the South 
Korean Government regards as "significant."  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 4 Apr 94 p 4) 

   ROK Third Country Exports 'Frustrated' by Quotas -- South Korean 
firms using third countries as a base for indirect exports are being 
frustrated by new trade regulations imposed by the advanced nations 
on developing ones and by preferential policies enacted toward 
domestic manufacturers in the developing countries themselves. 
According to the Korea Trade Promotion Corporation (KOTRA), the 
United States and European Union are using new quotas to limit 
exports from such third-world countries as Vietnam and Burma, and 
the latter are filling these quotas with products made by 
domestically-owned companies.  In the case of Burma, new quotas 
issued by the United States are causing ROK firms there, such as 
Segye Corp. and Daewoo, problems since 80-90 percent of their 
production had been going to the United States.  KOTRA will devise 
"countermeasures" when it finishes its survey of affected countries 
during the second quarter of 1994.  Since United States tariffs are 
tied to the human rights records of the exporting countries, KOTRA 
expects that ROK companies will take this into account in planning 
their investment strategies.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 30 Mar 94 
p 11) 

   Seoul District Civil Court Sets Up International Trade Court -- 
On 1 March the Seoul District Civil Court established its own 
International Trade Court to handle suits involving international 
trade disputes, such as international maritime shipping or 
international insurance disputes.  It will be composed of eight 
judges--six panel judges and two single judges.  (In the ROK legal 
system, there are two types of judges:  those who serve on a panel 
that judges a case, and those who sit in judgement on their own.) 
The civil court has staffed the new trade court with judges who have 
studied abroad, and intends to maintain a staff that has become 
familiar with foreign legal environments through overseas study. 
The need for such a court has arisen as South Korea emerges as an 
international trading country. 

   On 28 March the Seoul District Civil Court held a "bull session" 
involving 60 people from the Korea Chamber of Commerce and Industry, 
the Korea Commercial Arbitration Board, and other trade-related 
organizations, such as the Korea Export-Import Bank, the Korea 
Traders Association, and the Korea Shipping Society.  The 
participants were invited to share opinions on how the new 
International Trade Court should be managed.  A lawyer noted that in 
maritime cases the standards often differ for every port.  He 
commented that the court should set definite standards and then 
disseminate these standards to every lower court.  A manager at the 
Korea Traders Association observed that, in maritime disputes, the 
court prefers to ignore agreements or traditional practices and 
makes judgements solely based on actual laws.  As a result, the 
court often becomes an "international laughing stock."  He stated 
that judges can understand the real situation only if they 
understand the agreements and traditional practices in effect.  Ka 
Chae-hwan, chief of the Seoul District Civil Court, concluded that 
South Korea must clean up all facets of its judiciary and work to 
make ROK courts into model courts.  (Seoul CHUGAN CHOSON 14 Apr 94 
pp 82-83) 

   ROK Becoming World's Top Cathode-Ray Tube Producer -- According 
to data compiled by the Korea Trade Promotion Corporation (KOTRA), 
South Korea will be the largest cathode-ray tube producer in 1994. 
ROK production is expected to total 35 million units, while Japan is 
expected to produce 32 million units.  According to KOTRA's 
forecast, world demand for cathode-ray tubes in 1994 will equal 150 
million units, while supply will be between 138 and 146 million 
units.  (Seoul CHUNGANG ILBO 7 May 94 p 8) 

   Korea Heavy Industries To Build Thermal Power Plant in India -- 
Korea Heavy Industries has exchanged a memorandum of understanding 
with India's Essar Group to build a 500-megawatt thermal power 
plant.  The contract order is worth $50 million.  Korea Heavy 
Industries will supply a steam turbine generator, three heat 
recovery steam generators, and other components and systems to the 
plant, which will be built in an industrial complex northwest of 
Bombay.   The two companies also agreed to build a follow-on power 
plant, an oil refinery, and an ironworks.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE 
SINMUN 28 Apr 94 p 10) 

   Anam To Supply Semiconductors to Japan's NEC -- Anam Industrial 
Co. will assemble and supply for NEC of Japan about 10 percent of 
NEC's ASIC (application-specific integrated circuit) semiconductor 
chips beginning in June.  Anam's chips will be used in personal 
computers and communication equipment, namely the QFP (quad-flat 
package), and standard cells with 40 to 208 pins.  The ROK company's 
production costs are reportedly 30 percent lower than those in 
Japan.  (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 8 May 94 p 6) 

   Hyundai Steel Pipe To Build Plant in Vietnam -- Hyundai Steel 
Pipe has decided to build a joint venture steel pipe plant in 
Vietnam.  Its decision comes as the demand for steel pipe increases 
in Vietnam--due to growing investment in Vietnam's infrastructure- 
-and as the profitability of domestically produced ROK steel pipe 
decreases.  Hyundai is currently consulting on building a 40,000- 
tonne plant near Ho Chi Minh City.  The plant would require an 
investment of about 15 billion won ($18.75 million).  Hyundai will 
finalize its plans by June and begin construction during the latter 
half of the year.   (Seoul MAEIL KYONGJE SINMUN 3 May 94 p 10) 

   Mando Machinery To Manufacture Caliper Brakes in China - Mando 
Machinery has created a joint-venture car parts company with the 
Langfang Municipal Brake and Air Compressor Plant and Britain's 
Lucas Industries.  The $30-million joint venture will be located in 
the Langfang Industrial Complex in China's Hebei Province.  The 
plant will produce 300,000 caliper brakes beginning in 1995 and 
increase production to 600,000 units annually beginning in 1998. 
(Seoul CHOSON ILBO 9 May p 11) 

   Samsung To Export TDX to Russia - Samsung Electronics will export 
its new time division exchange (TDX) to Russia on a turnkey basis. 
Samsung recently signed a contract for the deal with the governor of 
Russia's Pskov region and the Russian telecommunications company 
GTS.  According to the contract, Samsung will supply its SDX-100 
(Samsung digital exchange) system with 20,000 phone lines to the 
city of Pskov, along with a power supply, testing equipment, and 
auxiliary facilities.  The SDX-l00 system can accommodate up to 
220,000 telephone lines, compared to 100,000 lines for the TDX-10 
system.  Samsung also signed an agreement to digitalize the 
communications network in the Russian province.  (Seoul THE KOREA 
TIMES 5 May 94 p 8) 

   Kia Motors, UK's Rover To Develop Car Engines - Kia Motors has 
signed a contract with the British firm Rover to jointly develop a 
gasoline engine.  The contract is part of Kia's plan to develop its 
own passenger car with a 2000-cc engine.  Under the terms of the 
contract, the two companies will develop 2000-cc and 2500-cc engines 
by 1997.  Kia plans to use a Japanese-made engine when it begins 
marketing its new car in 1996, but hopes to switch to using its 
jointly developed engine in the vehicle after 1997.  (Seoul MAEIL 
KYONGJE SINMUN 5 May 94 p 8) 

   SOUTHEAST ASIA - INDONESIA:  FEATURE: Impact of Industrial Growth 
on Rice Production -- SUMMARY:  Recent Jakarta newspapers reported 
that Indonesia's self-sufficiency in rice is threatened by 
industrial growth and could result in the country becoming a rice 
importer in the near future. 

   According to the 18 April SUARA PEMBARUAN and 19 April KOMPAS and 
MERDEKA, Indonesia's self-sufficiency in rice is threatened.  The 
decline in rice production is especially felt in Java--the center of 
industrial growth--according to Amrin Kahar, director-general for 
food crops in the Ministry of Agriculture.  Kahar said that Java 
with its fertile soil, good irrigation system, and adequate 
marketing and distribution systems, has long been considered the 
bread basket for Indonesia.  The island produces 60 percent of the 
nation's rice.  The papers see Indonesia as possibly returning to 
being the world's largest rice importer as it was before the l98Os. 

   According to SUARA PEMBARUAN, Soni Harsono, state minister for 
Agrarian Affairs and chairman of the National Land Agency, is also 
concerned about the problem.  The paper quoted him as saying that 
for the past few years, about 50,000 hectares of rice fields per 
year have become housing developments and industrial parks.  Based 
on two harvests per year and a yield of six tons per hectare, 
Indonesia's rice production has decreased by about 600,000 tons 
annually.  The minister pointed out that this means a $150-million 
annual loss without even taking into account the government's 
investment in developing irrigation facilities. 

   Industrialization has also created other "drawbacks" to rice 
production and to agriculture in general, according to MERDEKA.  In 
West Java, the sector is facing a decreasing supply of manpower.  An 
official of the Karawang agricultural service said that workers are 
scarce in the rice fields of Bekasi and Karawang (areas with newly- 
established large factories.)  It is difficult to compete with the 
higher wages offered by factories, he said.  The official also 
stated that industrialization has led to increased migration from 
rural areas other than Java. 

   An offshoot of industrial development that is also hurting rice 
production is a water shortage, according to SUARA PEMBARUAN. 
Faisal Kasryono, chairman of the Agriculture Research and 
Development Agency, said that 25,000 hectares of rice fields in Java 
have been lost because the water has been diverted to the factories. 

   To offset these losses, the government has tried to develop new 
rice fields outside Java, KOMPAS reported, but insufficient capital 
and poor infrastructure are "bottlenecks" that still need to be 
overcome.  From March 1993 to April 1994, Indonesia's goal was to 
develop 47,950 hectares of new fields.  However, as January 1994, 
only 7,012 hectares--about 14 percent of the goal--have been 
developed. 

   Pulp Joint Venture With Japan Announced -- Indonesia's Barito 
Pacific Timber Group and Japan's Marubeni Corporation and Nippon 
Paper Industries Co. have signed an agreement to establish a $1 
billion pulp factory in South Sumatra.  The factory, scheduled for 
completion in early 1997, is expected to have an annual production 
of 450,000 tons, all for export.  While final ownership is still 
being negotiated, it was determined that the Barito Group will have 
a 40-percent share in this venture.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 9 Apr 
94 p 1) 

   Daihatsu, Other Foreign Auto Production Growth -- The Japanese 
automaker Daihatsu has increased vehicle production in Indonesia by 
74 percent to 24,000 vehicles compared with 1993's output of 13,800 
vehicles.  Major components for its vehicles, such as stamped parts 
and engines, are procured through "Astra-Daihatsu Motors," its 
Indonesian joint venture company with the Astra Group, one of 
Indonesia's largest conglomerates.  Daihatsu vehicles are assembled 
at its Jakarta plant by the Indonesian firm Gaya Motors.  Four types 
of Daihatsu vehicles are produced, including its "Charade" 
subcompact and a recreational vehicle.  For Daihatsu, plant 
operating rates are rising, it has ample production capacity, there 
is no need for additional plant and equipment investment, and demand 
for vehicles appears strong. 

   1993 sales in Indonesia totaled about 200,000 units, "more than 
90 percent of which were produced by Japanese automakers."  Among 
other foreign automakers, South Korea's Hyundai Motors, in 
association with an Indonesian conglomerate, will begin production 
of small passenger cars in February 1995 at a plant being completed 
outside Jakarta.  Hyundai's production during the first fiscal year 
of operation will be 3,000 units, increasing to a maximum of 10,000 
units by 1999. 

   For Daihatsu, its Indonesian operations are an important part of 
its Asian production together with its operations in China and 
Malaysia.  In China, Daihatsu plans to increase passenger car 
production to 115,000 units in 1994, up from 47,000 vehicles 
assembled in 1993.  In Malaysia, Daihatsu, as the Japanese partner 
in Malaysia's "second national car project," will begin production 
of a new mini car in July 1994. (Tokyo NIKKEI SANGYO SHIMBUN 25 Apr 
94 p 11) 

   State Bank Obtains $87-Million Loan -- The People's Bank of 
Indonesia (BRI) has obtained a $37-million loan from a syndicate of 
37 foreign banks to be used as working capital.  Included in the 
syndicate are the Arab Bank, the DKB Merchant Bank and KDB 
Internatonal of Singapore, the Overseas-Chinese Banking Corp., the 
Westdeutsche Landesbank Girozentrale, and the Yasua Trust and 
Banking Co.  The loan is for 25 months at an interest rate of 1 
percent above SIBOR (Singapore Inter Bank Offered Rate).  BRI 
reported a 1993 profit of $53 million, and its loans amounted to 
$8.5 billion.  (Jakarta BISNIS INDONESIA 20 Apr 94 p 1) 

   Contract For Digital Telephone System Signed -- P.T. Telkom's 
Director Setyanto P. Santoso and representatives of the SNH 
consortium recently signed a contract for the second phase of the 
Indonesia central digital telephone system.  The contract, worth $34 
million, entails the installation of 444,100 telephone lines in over 
91 locations and is expected to be completed by June 1996.  The 
consortium comprises P.T. Humpuss, Sumitomo Corporation (Japan), and 
P.T. NEC Nusantara Communications.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 28 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Pertamina Begins Gas Production in South Sumatra -- South 
Sumatra's branch of the state-owned oil corporation Pertamina 
recently started producing natural gas for commercial purposes at 
Lembak district.  The daily 60-million cubic feet production will be 
supplied to P.T. Pupuk Sriwijaya.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 22 Apr 94 p 2) 

   Hong Kong Bank Opens Branch in Semarang -- The Hong Kong and 
Shanghai Banking Corporation recently opened a branch in Semarang to 
expand its service network.  Peter Atkins, manager of the Hong Kong 
and Shanghai Banking Corporation in Indonesia, stated that the 
bank's assets in Indonesia are currently $500 million and its 1992- 
93 profits were $8.5 million.  (Jakarta KOMPAS 25 Apr 94 P 2) 

   Firms To Participate in New Power Projects -- State Electric 
Company (PLN) President Zuhal and Giri Suseno Hadiarjo, vice 
chairman of the Agency for Strategic Industries (BPIS), recently 
signed an agreement for its 10 state-owned strategic industries to 
assist PLN in improving its power generation technology.  The five- 
year agreement calls for the 10 companies to participate in the 
construction of power plants, technology procurement, and joint 
research.  (Jakarta THE JAKARTA POST 16 Apr 94 p 8) 

   Government Allocates $1 Billion for Oil Refinery Projects -- The 
government has allocated $1 billion for the state-owned oil company 
Pertamina in fiscal year 1994/95 for its three investment projects 
in Cilacap (Central Java) and Balikpapan (East Kalimantan). 
Pertamina's Exploitation Director G.J. Atihuta said $600 million 
will be used for the Cilacap refinery to increase its production 
capacity from 300,000 to 350,000 barrels a day and the remainder 
will be for upgrading and modifying the two Balikpapan refineries to 
increase production to 65,000 barrels a day.  (Jakarta THE INDONESIA 
TIMES 6 May 94 p 1) 

   MALAYSIA:  Petronas To Supply Petroleum Products to Zimbabwe -- 
The National Petroleum Corporation (Petronas) has established a 
toehold in southern Africa after winning an open tender for the 
supply of 300,000 metric tons of petroleum products worth about 
$59.6 million to Zimbabwe.  The agreement was signed in February. 
(Kuala Lumpur NEW STRAITS TIMES 28 Apr 94 p 2) 

   South Korea Emerges as Seventh Foreign Investor -- South Korea 
has emerged as the seventh largest foreign investor in Malaysia, 
with investments amounting to approximately $1.2 billion in more 
than 140 manufacturing projects.  These projects have created 25,000 
jobs in Malaysia.  (Kuala Lumpur UTUSAN MALAYSIA 12 Apr 94 p 7) 

   PHILIPPINES:  Singapore Firm To Build Port, Industrial Complex in 
Iloilo -- The Singapore Transstroy International Pte. Ltd. has 
signed a memorandum of understanding with the municipal government 
of Leganes, Iloilo, to undertake a $1 billion reclamation and port 
development project under the build-operate-transfer program.  The 
project entails the reclamation of 1,000 hectares along the coastal 
area of the town and the development of a commercial port and 
industrial complex.  (Manila BUSINESS WORLD 10 May 94 p 4) 

   Board of Investments Approves PVC Resin Venture -- The Board of 
Investments has approved the establishment of a $600-million 
polyvinyl chloride (PVC) resin manufacturing plant by a consortium 
comprising Mabuhay Vinyl Corp., Bank of the Philippines, Mitsubishi 
Corp., and Tosoh Corp. of Japan.  The plant, to be located in 
Bataan, will start operations in July 1996 with an expected annual 
capacity of 60,000 metric tons.  (Quezon City MALAYA 3 May 94 pp 9, 
10) 

   SINGAPORE:  American, Japanese Firms Open Disk Drive Facility -- 
Quantum Corporation, an American disk drive maker, and Japan's 
Matsushita-Kotobuki Electronics have set up a logistics center and a 
factory, respectively.  The facilities opened on 26 April. 
Singapore produced about 21 million disk drives with a factory value 
of $5.8 billion in 1993, accounting for nearly half of world 
production of hard disk drives.  Quantum's new logistics center will 
take finished disk drives from Kotobuki Electronics Industries 
Singapore and configure them according to the specifications of 
Quantum's customers before delivery.  (Singapore THE STRAITS TIMES 
27 Apr 94 p 36) 

   Government Plans To Lower Corporate Tax Rate -- Singapore plans 
to cut its corporate tax rate from 27 percent to 25 percent to 
encourage further investments and to bolster its standing as a 
commercial and high-tech industrial hub.  To offset this reduction 
in government revenues, Singaporeans have begun paying a new tax on 
most goods and services.  (Kuala Lumpur BERITA HARIAN 12 Apr 94 p 5) 

   THAILAND:  Cabinet Authorizes Additional Telephone Circuits -- 
The Cabinet recently authorized the Communications Authority of 
Thailand (CAT) to install 10,000 additional circuits for 
international telephone calls.  Deputy Transport and Communications 
Minister Phinit Charusombat said the new circuits, which will cost 
$256 million, will make up the CAT's fourth international 
transmission switching center.  (Bangkok BANGKOK POST 11 May 94 p 6) 

   PTT, Total Company To Establish Gas Venture in Vietnam -- The 
Petroleum Authority of Thailand (PTT) and the France-based Total 
Company plan to establish Vietnam LPG Company Ltd., a liquefied 
petroleum gas venture with Vietnam Gas.  PTT will hold a 32-percent 
equity, while Vietnam Gas will hold 36 percent, and Total Company 
the remaining 32 percent. The 20-year, $15.04-million venture has a 
registered capital of $5.25 million and is expected to generate a 
return of 39 percent.  (Bangkok Radio Thailand Network 0000 GMT 11 
May 94) 

   Joint Venture With PRC Firm in Asian Oil Projects -- PetroAsia--a 
joint-venture company between Thailand's Charoen Phokkhaphan (CP) 
Group, the Petroleum Authority of Thailand (PAT), and the PRC state 
oil firm Sinopec--plans to invest up to $3.2 billion over the next 
five years in Asian projects.  Ventures are planned in oil refining, 
storage, distribution, wholesaling, and retailing in Thailand, the 
PRC, Vietnam, Cambodia, Laos, Burma, the Philippines, and 
Bangladesh.  On 2 May, the three partners formalized an agreement to 
set up a PetroAsia subsidiary known as PetroAsia (Thailand) to 
operate retail oil businesses in Thailand.  CP and PAT will hold 35 
percent each in the joint venture, while Sindpec will hold the 
remaining 30 percent.  The Thai unit will be responsible for setting 
up a retail network to include the establishment of at least 300 
standard service stations and 200 small outlets over the next 10 
years.  Total investment is estimated at more than $280 million. 
(Bangkok ZHONG HUA RIBAO 5 May 94 p 10) 

   VIETNAM:  Japanese Ministry To Help Establish Postal Savings 
System -- The Vietnamese Government has requested the assistance of 
Japan's Ministry of Posts and Telecommunications (MPT) in 
establishing a postal savings system.  The government's goal is to 
raise Vietnam's low individual savings rate and help improve the 
efficient use of such savings.  Currently Vietnam's more than 1,000 
post offices only handle mail and money exchange remittances. 

   In January 1994 the MPT began cooperating with Vietnamese 
personnel studying Japan's governmental system.  Now plans are to 
send MPT officials to Vietnam to provide advice concerning 
legislation for a new postal savings system, including advice on its 
organizational structure and the training of personnel.  The MPT has 
provided similar assistance to South Korea a d China in establishing 
their postal savings systems. (Tokyo NIKKEI KINYU SHIMBUN 26 Apr 94 
p 1) 

   Resolution Highlights City's Growth, Development Objectives -- At 
its midterm party conference held on 28-31 March, the Ho Chi Minh 
City party organization endorsed a resolution containing the 
following major economic objectives: 

   1.  Step up rationally structured industrialization and 
modernization. 

   Quickly invest to upgrade equipment and apply modern technology; 
emphasize production of consumer goods; gradually develop the 
machine tool and asssembly sector; improve agricultural programs; 
and gradually modernize infrastructure.  The conference set economic 
growth targets at 14 percent per year, with the total investment 
capital at 30 percent of GDP. 

   2.  Increase external economic operations. 

   Quickly build an international business center in Ho Chi Minh 
City; and move on to organize commercial representation abroad; and 
quickly attract foreign investment keyed to development, i.e. giving 
priority to infrastructure, farm produce processing, and consumer 
goods production along with development of high-technology 
industries. 

   3.  Create additional advantageous conditions for economic 
sectors to develop along socialist lines. 

   Continue research strengthening the cooperative economy; 
establish policies to support individual enterprises and small 
owners; and eliminate excessive bureaucracy regarding the approval 
and registration of commercial endeavors. 

   4.  Emphasize the role of science and industrial technology. 

   Make priority studies of the application of new industries, so 
that 50 percent of the production facilities will have undergone 
equipment renovation by the end of 1995.  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO 
KINH TE SAIGON 7 April 94 p 7) 

   Malaysian Company Upgrades Rice Mill for Exports -- The Tien 
Giang Grain Processing Company and the Malaysian firm Renong have 
formed a joint venture to process rice for export.  They began by 
restoring and upgrading the Tam Long rice mill in Cai Lay District. 
The mill's present capacity is 10,000 metric tons per year with a 
capacity of 30,000 metric tons expected by 1995.  Total investment 
capital amounts to $3.36 million, equally shared by both partners. 
(Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 30 Mar 94 p 6) 

   French Company to Produce Beer, Soft Drinks -- The French company 
B.G.I. and the Danang Brewery have formed a joint venture to produce 
beer and soft drinks.  Total investment capital is  $23.8 million, 
of which the French partner will contribute 70 percent. Construction 
has begun on the plant in in Quang Nam - Da Nang Province.  The 
plant's capacity will be 25 million liters per year with 80 percent 
beer and 20 percent soft drinks.  (Ho Chi Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE 
SAIGON 13 April 94 p 5) 

   State Bank to Invest $73 Million for Automation -- The Vietnam 
State Bank plans to invest some $73 million for automation and 
computerization of the SRV banking system.  The bank sees automation 
as a way to improve service which will attract more deposits from 
the public.  The automation process may take six years.  The World 
Bank will provide technical assistance.  Part of the automation cost 
will be borne by the Vietnam State Bank, and part by IMF and ADB 
loans.  (Hanoi HANOI MOI 21 April 94 p 2) 

   Rice Export Earnings Lower, Processing Methods Poor -- Vietnam's 
lack of modern rice processing methods is depressing profits on its 
annual exports of two million metric tons.  In January, Thai rice 
with five percent broken grains sold at $380-$390 per metric ton, 
but the Ministry of Trade set the export price for Vietnamese rice 
of the same grade at only $255 per ton in February.  With a 
difference of $125-$134 per ton, Vietnam "loses" approximately $200 
million per year.  Specialists say Vietnamese rice has a high 
moisture content when processed locally, which affects the taste. 
It also has a higher percentage of husks and impurities.  (Ho Chi 
Minh City THOI BAO KINH TE SAIGON 30 Mar 1994 p 4) 

   French, Norwegians in Harbor Construction Project -- Construction 
of the Phu My harbor in Chau Thanh District, Ba Ria-Vung Tau 
Province is expected to be finished in late 1995.  The new harbor 
will be built with a total investment capital of $9 million, of 
which the Vietnamese side is contributing 40 percent and the foreign 
partners-- France's Conco and Sogema Companies and Norway's Norsk 
Hydro Company--are contributing 60 percent.  In the first phase, the 
harbor will be able to handle ships of up to 40,000 tons.  (Hanoi 
VNA 1407 GMT 30 Apr 94) 

   British Petroleum in Lubricant Plant Joint Venture -- British 
Petroleum will open a $28 million lubricant plant in Nha Be 
District, Ho Chi Minh City in a joint venture with the Vietnamese 
oil export company Petrolimex.  It is expected to produce 50,000 
tons of lubricant per year.  (Hanoi Voice of Vietnam 1000 GMT 28 Apr 
94) 

   Rubber Industry Seeks Foreign Partners -- In an effort to 
increase its rubber production, the Vietnam Rubber Corporation has 
negotiated with Indian and Taiwanese companies to conduct 
feasibility studies to set up joint ventures in rubber plantations 
and processing.  Vietnam plans to set aside an additional 5,000 
hectares for rubber plantations.  (Hanoi VNA 1354 GMT 10 May 94) 
EAG/18May94/ECONF/TECHTF/EAST ASIA GROUP/PF 19/1645z May 

